<book xmlns="http://docbook.org/ns/docbook">
<info>
  <title>Awareness</title>
  <subtitle>The Perils and Opportunities of Reality</subtitle>
  <author><personaname><firstname>Thich</firstname><othername>Nhat</othername><surname>Hanh</surname></personaname></author>
  <copyright><year>1978</year><holder>M. Scott Peck, M.D.</holder></copyright>
</info>
<preface>
<title>Editor's Preface</title>
<para>Thich Nhat Hanh was born in central Vietnam in the mid-1920's, and in 1942, at the age of sixteen, he entered the monkhood. When war came to his country Nhat Hanh and many of his fellow monks left their monastic isolation and became actively engaged in helping victims of the war and in publicly communicating their desire for peace. In 1966, he was invited by the Fellowship of Reconciliation to tour the United States "to describe to [us] the aspirations and the agony of the voiceless masses of the Vietnamese people." He met with hundreds of groups and individuals, including Secretary of Defense McNamara, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Thomas Merton, and, in Europe, Pope Paul VI. As a result of his outspoken frankness, he was unable to return to Vietnam, threatened with arrest.</para>

<para>After the war ended, Nhat Hanh and his colleagues on the Vietnamese Buddhist Peace Delegation in Paris tried to find legal ways to send funds to Vietnam to help feed hungry children, but they were without success. The following year, the group went to Malaysia and Singapore to try to help insure the safety of boat people on the turbulent Gulf of Siam, but various governments thwarted those efforts as well. Uncertain how to proceed, Thich Nhat Hanh entered a period of retreat, and for more than five years he remained at his hermitage in France, meditating, writing, gardening, and occasionally seeing visitors. In 1982, he accepted an invitation to the Reverence for Life Conference in New York, and I was fortunate enough to attend that conference and meet him. Soft, slow-moving, and deeply penetrating, Nhat Hanh was described by fellow conference participant Richard Baker-roshi, as "a cross between a cloud, a snail, and a piece of heavy machinery &mdash; a true religious presence."</para>

<para>During that trip, Nhat Hanh became aware of the tremendous interest in Buddhist meditation among Americans, and he agreed to return the following year to lead retreats on Buddhism and peace work. A monk for more than forty years, he taught two generations of novices in Vietnam, developing the skill of expressing the deepest teachings of Buddhism in straightforward, yet poetic language. Because of his experience with the war and his willingness to face the realities of our time, his teachings are also about suffering, reconciliation, and peace.</para>

<para>Since those visits to North America, Nhat Hanh has returned annually. Being Peace is a collection of the talks he gave to peaceworkers and meditation students during his tour of Buddhist centers in the Fall of 1985. Most of these lectures were delivered to groups of retreatants who were together for several days practicing sitting and walking meditation, eating meals silently and discussing how to create a more peaceful world. Nhat Hanh invited the children present to sit in front of him for the first twenty or thirty minutes of each lecture, and you may notice passages where he is speaking to children, although he is also addressing the adults through them.</para>

<hr />

<para>The idea of this book arose during the tour, when several of us saw how deeply Nhat Hanh's words, in fact his entire presence, affected and penetrated his listeners. Thich Nhat Hanh's teachings provide a crucial antidote to our busy lives and to our anthropocentric way of perceiving. It has been a great pleasure to edit this volume, to make these teachings more widely available.</para>

<para>Many people helped create Being Peace, more than can be acknowledged here. I especially want to thank the Buddhist Peace Fellowship, for organizing the tour during which these talks were given; the Providence Zen Center, Rocky Mountain Dharma Center, Dharma Sangha, Ojai Foundation, Sonoma Mountain Zen Center, Green Gulch Zen Center, and Diamond Sangha for hosting these retreats; and Mayumi Oda, whose inspiration from meeting Nhat Hanh at Green Gulch gave birth to the illustrations for this book. I also want to thank the many friends of Nancy Wilson Ross, including Paul and Rachel Mellon, Mary Burke, ]ulius and Cleome Wadsworth, Margot Wilkie, ]ohn Bailes, Yvonne Rand, and Bill Sterling, whose generosity allowed work on this book to begin; Tyrone Cashman and Marlow and Cynthia Hotchkiss, whose support as we approached the crucial final stages made completion and publication possible; Carole Melkonian, Trish Farah, Don Stoddard, Sam Rose, and the other transcribers; Gay Reineck, for many hours overseeing the book's production; Jordan Thorn, Therese Fitzgerald, Andy Cooper, Dan Asimov, Paul Rosenblum, Ruth Klein, Tony Husch, Linda Foust, Vanja Palmers, Alan Brilliant, Jack Shoemaker, Brit Pyland, Toinette Lippe, Jean Weininger, Michael Phillips, Randall Goodall, Nelson Foster, Ananda Dalenberg, Gregory Wood, John and Margo Steiner, Rose Kotler, and the many others whose unfailing help have made Parallax Press a reality; and Cao Ngoc Phuong, whose selfless work &mdash; feeding hungry children, taking care of Plum Village, and looking after all the details that make Thich Nhat Hanh's work so effective &mdash; totally embodies the teachings of understanding and love that are the foundation of "being peace."</para>


Arnold Kotler
Berkeley California
Ianuary 1987
</preface>
<!--
Edited by Arnold Kotler
With illustrations by Mayumi Oda V
Parallax Press
Berkeley California

Being Peace

Parallax Press
P O. Box 7355
Berkeley, California 94707
© 1987, 1996 by Thich Nhat Hanh
Illustrations © 1987, by Mayumi Oda
All rights reserved.

The drawings in Being Peuce were created by Mayumi Oda specifically for this book.
Please do not photocopy or otherwise reproduce them for any purposes whatsoever.
Printed in the United States of America

22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 30 / 03 02 01 00

Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data

Nhat Hanh, Thich
Being Peace
Collection of talks given during visit to U.S. in fall of 1985.
1. Religious life (Buddhism)
I. Kotler, Amold, 1946 — II. Title
BQ5410.N45 1987 2943444 87-2340
ISBN 0-938077-00-7
-->
<!--
Being Peace
If we are peaceful, if we are happy,
we can blossom like a flower,
and everyone in our family,
our entire society,
will benefit from our peace.
-->
<chapter>
<title>Suffering Is Not Enough</title>

<para>Life is filled with suffering, but it is also filled with many wonders, like the blue sky the sunshine, the eyes of a baby. To suffer is not enough. We must also be in touch with the wonders of life. They are within us and all around us, everywhere, any time.</para>

<para>If we are not happy, if we are not peaceful, we cannot share peace and happiness with others, even those we love, those who live under the same roof. If we are peaceful, if we are happy, we can smile and blossom like a flower, and everyone in our family, our entire society will benefit from our peace. Do we need to make a special effort to enjoy the beauty of the blue sky? Do we have to practice to be able to enjoy it? No, we just enjoy it. Each second, each minute of our lives can be like this. Wherever we are, any time, we have the capacity to enjoy the sunshine, the presence of each other, even the sensation of our breathing. We don't need to go to China to enjoy the blue sky. We don't have to travel into the future to enjoy our breathing. We can be in touch with these things right now. It would be a pity if we were only aware of suffering.</para>

<para>We are so busy we hardly have time to look at the people we love, even in our own household, and to look at ourselves. Society is organized in a way that even when we have some leisure time, we don't know how to use it to get back in touch with ourselves. We have millions of ways to lose this precious time &mdash; we turn on the TV or pick up the telephone, or start the car and go somewhere. We are not used to being with ourselves, and we act as if we don't like ourselves and are trying to escape from ourselves.</para>

<para>Meditation is to be aware of what is going on &mdash; in our bodies, in our feelings, in our minds, and in the world. Each day 40,000 children die of hunger. The superpowers now have more than 50,000 nuclear warheads, enough to destroy our planet many times. Yet the sunrise is beautiful, and the rose that bloomed this morning along the wall is a miracle. Life is both dreadful and wonderful. To practice meditation is to be in touch with both aspects. Please do not think we must be solemn in order to meditate. In fact, to meditate well, we have to smile a lot.</para>

<para>Recently I was sitting with a group of children, and a boy named Tim was smiling beautifully. I said, "Tim, you have a very beautiful smile," and he said, "Thank you." I told him, "You don't have to thank me, I have to thank you. Because of your smile, you make life more beautiful. Instead of saying, 'Thank you,' you should say 'You're welcome.'"</para>

<para>If a child smiles, if an adult smiles, that is very important. If in our daily life we can smile, if we can be peaceful and happy not only we, but everyone will profit from it. This is the most basic kind of peace work. When I see Tim smiling, I am so happy. If he is aware that he is making other people happy he can say "You are welcome."</para>

<hr />

<para>From time to time, to remind ourselves to relax, to be peaceful, we may wish to set aside some time for a retreat, a day of mindfulness, when we can walk slowly, smile, drink tea with a friend, enjoy being together as if we are the happiest people on Earth. This is not a retreat, it is a treat. During walking meditation, during kitchen and garden work, during sitting meditation, all day long, we can practice smiling. At first you may find it difficult to smile, and we have to think about why Smiling means that we are ourselves, that we have sovereignty over ourselves, that we are not drowned into forgetfulness. This kind of smile can be seen on the faces of Buddhas and bodhisattvas.</para>

<para>I would like to offer one short poem you can recite from time to time, while breathing and smiling.</para>

<para>
Breathing in, I calm my body.
Breathing out, I smile.
Dwelling in the present moment
I know this a wonderful moment.
</para>

<para>"Breathing in, I calm my body." This line is like drinking a glass of ice water &mdash; you feel the cold, the freshness, permeate your body. When I breathe in and recite this line, I actually feel the breathing calming my body calming my mind.</para>

<para>"Breathing out, I smile." You know the effect of a smile. A smile can relax hundreds of muscles in your face, and relax your nervous system. A smile makes you master of yourself. That is why the Buddhas and bodhisattvas are always smiling. When you smile, you realize the wonder of the smile.</para>

<para>"Dwelling in the present moment." While I sit here, I don't think of somewhere else, of the future or the past. I sit here, and I know where I am. This is very important. We tend to be alive in the future, not now. We say "Wait until I finish school and get my Ph.D. degree, and then I will be really alive." When we have it, and it's not easy to get, we say to ourselves, "I have to wait until I have a job in order to be really alive." And then after the job, a car. After the car, a house. We are not capable of being alive in the present moment. We tend to postpone being alive to the future, the distant future, we don't know when. Now is not the moment to be alive. We may never be alive at all in our entire life. Therefore, the technique, if we have to speak of a technique, is to be in the present moment, to be aware that we are here and now, and the only moment to be alive is the present moment.</para>

<para>"I know this is a wonderful moment." This is the only moment that is real. To be here and now, and enjoy the present moment is our most important task. "Calming, Smiling, Present moment. Wonderful moment." I hope you will try it.</para>

<hr />

<para>Even though life is hard, even though it is sometimes difficult to smile, we have to try. Just as when we wish each other "Good morning," it must be a real "Good morning." Recently one friend asked me, "How can I force myself to smile when I am filled with sorrow? It isn't natural." I told her she must be able to smile to her sorrow, because we are more than our sorrow. A human being is like a television set with millions of channels. If we turn the Buddha on, we are the Buddha. If we turn sorrow on, we are sorrow. If we turn a smile on, we really are the smile. We cannot let just one channel dominate us. We have the seed of everything in us, and we have to seize the situation in our hand, to recover our own sovereignty.</para>

<para>When we sit down peacefully breathing and smiling, with awareness, we are our true selves, we have sovereignty over ourselves. When we open ourselves up to a TV program, we let ourselves be invaded by the program. Sometimes it is a good program, but often it is just noisy. Because we want to have something other than ourselves enter us, we sit there and let a noisy television program invade us, assail us, destroy us. Even if our nervous system suffers, we don't have the courage to stand up and turn it off, because if we do that, we will have to retum to our self.</para>

<para>Meditation is the opposite. It helps us return to our true self. Practicing meditation in this kind of society is very difficult. Everything seems to work in concert to try to take us away from our true self. We have thousands of things, like videotapes and music, which help us be away from ourselves. Practicing meditation is to be aware, to smile, to breathe. These are on the opposite side. We go back to ourselves in order to see what is going on, because to meditate means to be aware of what is going on. What is going on is very important.</para>

<hr />

<para>Suppose you are expecting a child. You need to breathe and smile for him or her. Please don't wait until your baby is born before beginning to take care of him or her. You can take care of your baby right now, or even sooner. If you cannot smile, that is very serious. You might think, "I am too sad. Smiling is just not the correct thing to do." Maybe crying or shouting would be correct, but your baby will get it &mdash; anything you are, anything you do, is for your baby.</para>

<para>Even if you do not have a baby in your womb, the seed is already there. Even if you are not married, even if you are a man, you should be aware that a baby is already there, the seeds of future generations are already there. Please don't wait until the doctors tell you that you are going to have a baby to begin to take care of it. lt is already there. Whatever you are, whatever you do, your baby will get it. Anything you eat, any worries that are on your mind will be for him or her. Can you tell me that you cannot smile? Think of the baby and smile for him, for her, for the future generations. Please don't tell me that a smile and your sorrow just don't go together. It's your sorrow, but what about your baby? It's not his sorrow, it's not her sorrow.</para>

<para>Children understand very well that in each woman, in each man, there is a capacity of waking up, of understanding, and of loving. Many children have told me that they cannot show me anyone who does not have this capacity. Some people allow it to develop, and some do not, but everyone has it. This capacity of waking up, of being aware of what is going on in your feelings, in your body, in your perceptions, in the world, is called Buddha nature, the capacity of understanding and loving. Since the baby of that Buddha is in us, we should give him or her a chance. Smiling is very important. If we are not able to smile, then the world will not have peace. It is not by going out for a demonstration against nuclear missiles that we can bring about peace. It is with our capacity of smiling, breathing, and being peace that we can make peace.</para>
</chapter>

<chapter>
<title>The Three Gems</title>

Many of us worry about the situation of the
world. We don't know when the bombs will
explode. We feel that we are on the edge of time. As
individuals, we feel helpless, despairing. The situation
is so dangerous, injustice is so widespread, the danger
is so close. In this kind of situation, if we panic, things
will only become worse. We need to remain calm, to
see clearly Meditation is to be aware, and to try to
help.

I like to use the example of a small boat crossing
the Gulf of Siam. In Vietnam, there are many people,
called boat people, who leave the country in small
boats. Often the boats are caught in rough seas or
storms, the people may panic, and boats can sink. But
if even one person aboard can remain calm, lucid,
knowing what to do and what not to do, he or she can
help the boat survive. His or her expression-face,
voice-communicates clarity and calmness, and people have trust in that person. They will listen to what
he or she says. One such person can save the lives of
many.

Our world is something like a small boat.
Compared with the cosmos, our planet is a very
small boat. We are about to panic because our situa-
tion is no better than the situation of the small boat in
the sea. You know that we have more than 50,000
nuclear weapons. Humankind has become a very
dangerous species. We need people who can sit still
and be able to smile, who can walk peacefully. We
need people like that in order to save us. Mahayana
Buddhism says that you are that person, that each of
you is that person.

<hr />

I had one student named Thich Thanh Van, who
entered the monastery at the age of six, and at the
age of seventeen, began to study with me. Later he
was the first director of the School of Youth for Social
Service, where he directed thousands of young peo-
ple working during the war in Vietnam, rebuilding
villages that were destroyed, and resettling tens of
thousands of refugees fleeing the warzones. He was
killed in an accident. I was in Copenhagen when I
heard of the death of my student. He was a very gen-
tle monk, very brave.

When he was a novice, six or seven years old, he
saw people come to the temple and bring cakes and
bananas to offer to the Buddha. He wanted to know
how the Buddha eats bananas, so he waited until
everyone went home and the shrine was closed, and
then he peered through the door, waiting for the
Buddha to reach out his hand, take a banana, peel it,
and eat it. He waited and waited, but nothing hap-
pened. The Buddha did not seem to eat bananas,
unless he realized that someone was spying on him.
Thich Thanh Van told me several other stories
about when he was a young boy. l/Vhen he discovered that the statue of the Buddha is not the Buddha,
he began to ask where the Buddhas are, because it
did not seem to him that Buddhas were living among
humans. He concluded that Buddhas must not be
very nice, because when people became Buddhas,
they would leave us to go to a faraway country. I told
him that Buddhas are us. They are made of flesh and
bones, not copper or silver or gold. The Buddha
statue is just a symbol of the Buddha, in the same
way the American flag is a symbol of America. The
American flag is not the American people.
The root-word budh means to wake up, to know, to
understand; and he or she who wakes up and understands is called a Buddha. It is as simple as that. The
capacity to wake up, to understand, and to love is
called Buddha nature. When Buddhists say "l take
refuge in the Buddha," they are expressing trust in
their own capacity of understanding, of becoming
awake. The Chinese and the Vietnamese say, "I go
back and rely on the Buddha in me." Adding "in me"
makes it very clear that you yourself are the Buddha.

In Buddhism, there are three gems: Buddha, the
awakened one; Dharma, the way of understanding
and loving; and Sangha, the community that lives in
harmony and awareness. The three are interrelated,
and at times it is hard to distinguish one from
another. In everyone there is the capacity to wake up,
to understand, and to love. So in ourselves we find
Buddha, and we also find Dharma and Sangha. I will
explain more about Dharma and Sangha, but first I
want to say something about Buddha, the one who
develops his or her understanding and loving to the
highest degree. (In Sanskrit, understanding is prajhu
and love is karunu and maitri.)

Understanding and love are not two things, but
just one. Suppose your son wakes up one morning
and sees that it is already quite late. He decides to
wake up his younger sister, to give her enough time
to eat breakfast before going to school. It happens
that she is grouchy and instead of saying, "Thank
you for waking me up," she says, "Shut up! Leave
me alone!" and kicks him. He will probably get
angry thinking, "I woke her up nicely Why did she
kick me?" He may want to go to the kitchen and tell
you about it, or even kick her back. But then he
remembers that during the night his sister coughed a
lot, and he realizes that she must be sick. Maybe she
has a cold, maybe that is why she behaved so meanly.
He is not angry anymore. At that moment there is
budh in him. He understands, he is awake. When you
understand, you cannot help but love. You cannot
get angry. To develop understanding, you have to
practice looking at all living beings with the eyes of
compassion. When you understand, you love. And
when you love, you naturally act in a way that can
relieve the suffering of people.
Someone who is awake, who knows, who under-
stands, is called a Buddha. Buddha is in everyone of
us. We can become awake, understanding, and also
loving. I often tell children that if their mother or
father is very understanding and loving, working,
taking care of the family, smiling, being lovely, like a
flower, they can say; "Mommy (or Daddy), you are
all Buddha today"

Two thousand five hundred years ago there was a
person who practiced in a way that his understand-
ing and love became perfected, and everyone in the
world recognized this. His name was Siddhartha.
When Siddhartha was very young, he began to
think that life had a lot of suffering in it, that people
do not love each other enough, do not understand
each other enough. So he left his home to go to the
forest to practice meditating, breathing, and smiling.
He became a monk, and he tried to practice in order
to develop his awakening, his understanding, and
his love to the highest levels. He practiced sitting
meditation and walking meditation for several
years with five friends who were also monks.
Although they were intelligent people, they made
mistakes. For instance, each day they ate only one
piece of fruit-one mango, or one guava, or one star
fruit. Sometimes people exaggerate, and say that
Siddhartha ate only one sesame seed a day, but I
went to the forest in India where he practiced, and I
know that is silly because there are no sesame seeds
there. I saw also the Neranjara River, in which he
bathed several times, and the Bodhi tree where he
sat and became a Buddha. The Bodhi tree I saw is
not the same tree, it is the great-great-great-grandchild of the first Bodhi tree.

One day Siddhartha became so weak that he
could not practice, and as he was an intelligent
young man, he decided to go to the village and get
something to eat-bananas or cake or anything. But
as soon as he took four or five steps, he stnunbled
and fainted; he lost consciousness because he was
too hungry. He would have died, but a milkmaid
carrying milk to the village saw him and came over.
She found that he was still alive, still breathing, but
very weak, and so she took a bowl and poured some
milk into his mouth. At first Siddhartha did not
react, but then his lips moved and he began to drink
the milk. He drank a whole bowl of milk, and he felt
much better and slowly sat up. He looked beautiful,
because Siddhartha was a very very handsome per-
son. Nowadays people make statues of him which
are not very handsome. Sometimes they are even
grouchy without any smile on his face. But he was a
very beautiful person, and the milkmaid thought
that he must be the god of the mountain. She
kneeled down and was about to worship, but he
stretched out his arm to tell her not to, and he told her
something. What do you think he must have said to
her?

He said, "Please give me another bowl of milk." He
saw that the milk was doing wonderful things, and he
knew that once our body is strong enough, we can succeed in meditation. The young lady was so happy, she
poured him another bowl of milk. After that, she
inquired about him, and he said that he was a monk,
trying to meditate to develop his compassion and his
understanding to the highest level so that he could
help other people. She asked if there was anything she
could do to help, and Siddhartha said, "Each day at
noontime, can you give me a small bowl of rice? That
would help me very much." So from that day on, she
brought him some rice wrapped in banana leaves, and
sometimes she also brought milk.

The five other monks Siddhartha had been practicing with despised him and thought him worthless.
"Let us go somewhere else to practice. He drinks milk,
and he eats rice. He has no perseverance." But
Siddhartha did very well. Day in and day out he meditated, and he developed his insight, his understanding,
and his compassion very very quickly as he recovered
his health.

One day after taking a swim in the Neranjara River,
he had the impression that he only needed one more
sitting to come to a total breakthrough, to become a
fully enlightened person. When he was about to sit
down, still practicing walking meditation, a buffalo
boy came by. In India 2,500 years ago, buffaloes were
used to pull the plows, and a buffalo boy's job was
to watch them, bathe and take care of them, and cut
grass for them to eat.

As the buffalo boy came by he saw Siddhartha
walking very peacefully, and he liked him immediately. Sometimes we see someone we like very much,
even if we don't know why. The boy wanted to say
something, but he was shy so he came near
Siddhartha three or four times before saying,
"Gentleman, I like you very much." Siddhartha
looked at him and said, "I like you also."
Encouraged by this response, the boy told him, "I
really want to give you something, but I have nothing I can give you." And Siddhartha said, "You do
have something that I need. You have very beautiful
green grass that you just cut. If you want to, please
give me an armful of that grass." The boy was so
happy to be able to give him something, and
Siddhartha thanked him very much. After the buffalo boy left, Siddhartha spread the grass into a kind
of cushion that he could sit on.

As he sat down, he made a firm vow, "Until I get
true enlightenment, I shall not stand up." With this
strong determination, he meditated all night, and
when the morning star appeared in the sky, he
became a fully enlightened person, a Buddha, with
the highest capacity to understand and to love.

<hr />

The Buddha stayed at that spot for two weeks, smiling and enjoying his breathing. Every day the milkmaid brought him rice and the buffalo boy also came
by to see him. He taught them about understanding,
loving, and being awake. There is a scripture in the
Pali Canon called Sutta Of Tending Buffaloes, which
lists eleven skills a buffalo boy must have, such as
recognizing his own buffaloes, making smoke to keep
mosquitoes away taking care of wounds on the body
of buffaloes, helping buffaloes cross rivers, and finding places with enough grass and water to eat. After
listing eleven skills, the Buddha tells the monks that
meditation is also like this, and he lists eleven parallel skills for monks-recognizing the five components
of a htunan being, and so on. Most stories of the life
of the Buddha overlook the two weeks he stayed near
the Bodhi tree, meeting with the milkmaid and the
buffalo boy walking slowly, enjoying themselves. But
I am sure it happened this way. Otherwise how could
the Buddha have delivered the Suttu of Tending
Buffaloes? In fact, when the buffalo boy grew up, he
must have become a disciple of the Buddha, and one
day as he sat in the front of the assembly, the Buddha
delivered that sutta.

<hr />

After two weeks, the Buddha realized he had to get
up from his seat under the Bodhi tree and share his
understanding and compassion with other people.
He told the milkmaid and the buffalo boy "I am
sorry but I have to leave now. We are so happy
together, but I must go and work with the adults."

He thought about who he could share his understanding and compassion with, and he thought of
the five friends who had practiced with him. He
walked an entire day in order to find them, and
when he happened upon their camp, they had just
finished their afternoon sitting meditation. They sat
a lot. They were very thin by now, as you can imagine. One of them saw the Buddha coming and said
to the others, "Don't stand up if he comes. Don't go
to the gate to welcome him. Don't go and fetch
water for him to wash his feet and his hands. He
didn't persevere. He ate rice, and he drank milk."
But when he arrived he was so attractive and so
peaceful that they could not help themselves from
offering him water to wash his feet and his hands
and giving him a special seat. The Buddha told
them, "Friends, I have found a way to develop
understanding and loving. Please sit down, I'll teach
you." They did not believe, at first. They said,
"Siddhartha, while we practiced together, you gave
up. You drank milk, you ate rice. How is it possible
you have become a fully enlightened person? Please
tell us. We cannot believe it." The Buddha said,
"Friends, have I ever told you a lie?" In fact, he had
never lied to anyone, and these five friends remembered that. "I have never told you a lie. Now I am
not telling you a lie. I have become a fully enlightened person, and l'll be your teacher. Sit down, and
listen to me." And the five of them sat down and listened to the Buddha. He gave his first Dharma talk
for adults. If you want to read his words, they are
available in a wonderful sutta explaining the basic
doctrines of Buddhism: suffering, the causes of suffering, the removal of suffering, and the way to do it.
I have read many accounts of the life of the
Buddha, and I see him as a person like us. Sometimes
artists draw a Buddha in a way that we cannot recognize him as a human being. In fact, he is a human
being. I have seen so many Buddha statues, but not
many really beautiful and simple ones. If anytime you
want to draw a picture of a Buddha, please sit down
and breathe for five or ten minutes, smiling, before
you pick up the pen to draw a Buddha. Then draw a
simple Buddha, beautiful but simple, with a smile.
And if you can, draw some children sitting with him.
Buddha is young, not too grim, not too solemn, with a
very light smile on his face. We have to go in this '
direction, because, when we look at the Buddha, we
have to like him just as the buffalo boy and the milkmaid did.

<hr />

When we say "I take refuge in the Buddha," we
should also understand that "The Buddha takes
refuge in me," because without the second part the
first part is not complete. The Buddha needs us for
awakening, understanding, and love to be real things
and not just concepts. They must be real things that
have real effects on life. Whenever I say, "I take refuge
in the Buddha," I hear "Buddha takes refuge in me."
There is a verse for planting trees and other plants:

<para>
I entrust myself to earth,
Earth entrusts herself to me.
I entrust myself to Buddha,
Buddha entrusts herself to me.
</para>

"I entrust myself to earth" is like "I take refuge in
the Buddha." (I identify myself with the plant.) The
plant will die or be alive because of the earth. The
plant takes refuge in the earth, the soil. But earth
entrusts herself to me because each leaf that falls
down and decomposes makes the soil richer. We
know that the layer of soil that is rich and beautiful
has been made by the vegetation. If our earth is
green and beautiful, it is because of this vegetation.
Therefore, while the vegetation needs the earth, the
earth also needs the vegetation to express herself as
a beautiful planet. So when we say "I entrust myself
to earth," I, the plant, have to hear the other version
also: "Earth entrusts herself to me." "I entrust
myself to Buddha, Buddha entrusts herself to me."
Then it is very clear that the wisdom, the understanding and love of Shakyamuni Buddha needs us
to be real again in life. Therefore, we have a very
important task: to realize awakening, to realize compassion, to realize understanding.

We are all Buddhas, because only through us can
understanding and love become tangible and effective. Thich Thanh Van was killed during his effort to
help other people. He was a good Buddhist, he was
a good Buddha, because he was able to help tens
of thousands of people, victims of the war. Because
of him, awakening, understanding, and love were
real things. So we can cali him a Buddha body, in
Sanskrit Buddhakaya. For Buddhism to be real, there
must be a Buddhakaya, an embodiment of awakened
activity. Otherwise Buddhism is just a word. Thich
Thanh Van was a Buddhakaya. Shakyamuni was a
Buddhakaya. When we realize awakening, when we
are understanding and loving, each of us is a
Buddhakaya.

The second gem is the Dharma. Dharma is what the
Buddha taught. It is the way of understanding and
love-how to understand, how to love, how to make
understanding and love into real things. Before the
Buddha passed away, he said to his students, "Dear
people, my physical body will not be here tomorrow,
but my teaching body will always be here to help.
You can consider it as your own teacher, a teacher
who never leaves you." That is the birth of
Dharmakaya. The Dharma has a body also, the body
of the teaching, or the body of the way. As you can
see, the meaning of Dharmakaya is quite simple,
although people in Mahayana have made it very
complicated. Dharmakaya just means the teaching of
the Buddha, the way to realize understanding and
love. Later it became something like the ontological
ground of being.

Anything that can help you wake up has Buddha
nature. When I am alone and a bird calls me, I return
to myself, Ibreathe, and I smile, and sometimes it
calls me once more. I smile and I say to the bird, "I
hear already." Not only sounds, but sights can
remind you to return to your true self. In the morning when you open your window and see the light
streaming in, you can recognize it as the voice of the
Dharma, and it becomes part of the Dharmakaya.
That is why people who are awake see the manifestation of the Dharma in everything. A pebble, a bamboo tree, the cry of a baby anything can be the voice
of the Dharma calling. We should be able to practice
like that.

One day a monk came to Tue Trung, the most
illustrious teacher of Buddhism in Vietnam in the
thirteenth century a time when Buddhism was flourishing in Vietnam. The monk asked him, "What is the
pure, inunaculate Dharmakaya?'j and Tue Trung
pointed to the excrement of a horse. This was an
irreverent approach to Dharmakaya, because people
were using the word immaculate to describe it. You
cannot use words to describe the Dharmakaya. Even
though we say that it is immaculate, pure, that does
not mean it is separate from things that are impure.
Reality ultimate reality is free from all adjectives,
either pure or impure. So his response was to shake
up the mind of the monk, for him to cleanse himself
of all these adjectives in order to see into the nature
of the Dharmakaya. A teacher is also part of the
Dharmakaya because she or he helps us be awake.
The way she looks, the way she lives her daily life,
the way she deals with people, animals, and plants
helps us realize understanding and love in our life.

There are many ways of teaching: teaching by
words, teaching by books, teaching by tape recorders.
I have a friend who is a Zen teacher in Vietnam, quite
well known, but not many people can come and
study with him. Therefore, they make tape recordings
of his talks, and he has become known as Cassette
Monk! He is still in Vietnam. The government just
chased him away from his monastery, so he had to go
to another place to teach. He is not allowed to preach
in Ho Chi Minh City because if he teaches there, too
many people come to hear him, and the government
doesn't like that.

Even if he does not teach, his being is very helpful
to us in being awake, for he is part of the
Dharmakaya. Dharmakaya is not just expressed in
words, in sounds. lt can express itself in just being.
Sometimes if we don't do anything, we help more
than if we do a lot. We call that nonaction. It is like
the calm person on a small boat in a storm. That person does not have to do much, just to be himself and
the situation can change. That is also an aspect of
Dharmakaya: not talking, not teaching, just being.
This is true not only of humans, but other species
as well. Look at the trees in our yard. An oak tree is
an oak tree. That is all it has to do. If an oak tree is
less than an oak tree, then we are all in trouble.
Therefore, the oak tree is preaching the Dharma.
Without doing anything, not serving in the School
of Youth for Social Service, not preaching, not even
sitting in meditation, the oak tree is very helpful to
all of us just by being there. Every time we look at
the oak tree we have confidence. During the summer
we sit under it and we feel cool, relaxed. We know
that if the oak tree is not there, and all the other trees
are not there, we will not have good air to breathe.
We also know that in our former lives we were
trees. Maybe we have been an oak tree ourselves.
This is not just Buddhist; this is scientific. The human
species is a very young species-we appeared on the
earth only recently. Before that, we were rock, we
were gas, we were minerals, and then we were sin-
gle-celled beings. We were plants, we were trees, and
now we have become humans. We have to recall our
past existences. This is not difficult. You just sit down
and breathe and look, and you can see your past exis-
tences. When we shout at the oak tree, the oak tree is
not offended. When we praise the oak tree, it doesn't
raise its nose. We can learn the Dharma from the oak
tree; therefore, the oak tree is part of our
Dharmakaya. We can learn from everything that is
around, that is in us. Even if we are not at a medita-
tion center, we can still practice at home, because
around us the Dharma is present. Everything is
preaching the Dharma. Each pebble, each leaf, each
flower is preaching the Saddharma Punduriku Sutra.
¤(· >(· >(·
The Sangha is the community that lives in harmony
and awareness. Sanghukayu is a new Sanskrit term.
The Sangha needs a body also. When you are with
your family and you practice smiling, breathing, recognizing the Buddha body in yourself and your chil-
dren, then your family becomes a Sangha. If you
have a bell in your home, the bell becomes part of
your Sanghakaya, because the bell helps you to prac-
tice. lf you have a cushion, then the cushion also
becomes part of the Sanghakaya. Many things help
us practice. The air, for breathing. If you have a park
or a riverbanl< near your home, you are very fortu-
nate because you can enjoy practicing walking medi-
tation. You have to discover your Sanghakaya, invit-
ing a friend to come and practice with you, have tea
meditation, sit with you, join you for walking medi-
tation. All those efforts are to establish your
Sanghakaya at home. Practice is easier if you have a
Sanghakaya

Siddhartha, the Buddha-to-be, while practicing
with other people, began to drink milk, and the five
monks who were with him went away. So he made
the Bodhi tree into his Sanghakaya. He made the buf-
falo boy, the milkrnaid, the river, the trees, and the
birds around him into his Sanghakaya. There are
those in Vietnam who live in reeducation camps.
They don't have a Sangha. They don't have a Zen
center. But they practice. They have to look upon
other things as part of their Sanghakaya. I know of
people who practiced walking meditation in their
prison cells. They told me this after they got out of
the camp. So while we are lucky, while we are still
capable of finding so many elements to set up our
Sanghakaya, we should do so. A friend, our own chil-
dren, our own brother or sister, our house, the trees
in our backyard, all of them can be part of our
Sanghakaya.

Practicing Buddhism, practicing meditation is for
us to be serene and happy understanding and loving.
In that way we work for the peace and happiness of
our family and our society. If we look closely the
Three Gems are actually one. In each of them, the
other two are already there. In Buddha, there is
Buddhahood, there is the Buddha body. In Buddha
there is the Dharma body because without the
Dharma body he could not have become a Buddha.
In the Buddha there is the Sangha body because he
had breakfast with the Bodhi tree, with the other
trees, and birds and environment. In a meditation
center, we have a Sangha body Sanghakaya, because
the way of understanding and compassion is prac-
ticed there. Therefore the Dharma body is present,
the way the teaching is present. But the teaching can-
not become real without the life and body of each of
us. So the Buddhakaya is also present. If Buddha and
Dharma are not present, it is not a Sangha. Without
you, the Buddha is not real, it is just an idea.
Without you, the Dharma cannot be practiced. It
has to be practiced by someone. Without each of you,
the Sangha cannot be. That is why when we say "I
take refuge in the Buddha," we also hear, "The
Buddha takes refuge in me." "I take refuge in the
Dharma. The Dharma takes refuge in me. I take
refuge in the Sangha. The Sangha takes refuge in
me."


c u A P T z R T H n E s
Feelings and Perceptions
According to Buddhism, human beings are com-
posed of five aggregates: form, which means
our body including the five sense organs and the ner-
vous system; feelings; perceptions; mental forma-
tions; and consciousness. I would like to explain
about feelings and perceptions.
Every day we have many feelings. Sometimes we
are happy sometimes we are sorrowful, sometimes
angry, irritated, or afraid; and these feelings fill our
mind and heart. One feeling lasts for a while, and
then another comes, and another, as if there is a
stream of feelings for us to deal with. Practicing med-
itation is to be aware of each feeling.
The Abhidharma writings on Buddhist psychology
say that feelings are of three kinds: pleasant, un- A
pleasant, and neutral. When we step on a thorn, we
have an unpleasant feeling. When someone says
something nice to us, "You are very smart," or "You
are very beautiful," we have a pleasant feeling. And
there are neutral feelings, such as when you sit there
and don't feel either pleasant or unpleasant. But I
have read the Abhidharma and have practiced
Buddhism, and I find this analysis not correct. A so-
called neutral feeling can become very pleasant. If
you sit down, very beautifully and practice breath-
ing and smiling, you can be very happy. When you
sit in this way aware that you have a feeling of well-
being, that you don't have a toothache, that your
eyes are capable of seeing forms and colors, isn't it
wonderful?

For some people, working is unpleasant, and they
suffer when they have to work. For other people, if
they are forbidden from working, it is unpleasant. I
do many kinds of work, and if you forbid me from
binding books, from gardening, from writing poetry
from practicing walking meditation, from teaching
children, I will be very unhappy. To me, work is
pleasant. Pleasant or unpleasant depends on our
way of looking.

We call seeing a neutral feeling. Yet someone who
has lost her sight would give anything to be able to
see, and if suddenly she could, she would consider
it a miraculous gift. We who have eyes capable of
seeing many forms and colors are often unhappy If
we want to practice, we can go out and look at
leaves, flowers, children, and clouds, and be happy.
Whether or not we are happy depends on our
awareness. When you have a toothache, you think

as resumes Amo mzceianows
that not having a toothache will make you very
happy. But when you don't have a toothache, often
you are still not happy. If you practice awareness,
you suddenly become very rich, very very happy.
Practicing Buddhism is a clever way to enjoy life.
Happiness is available. Please help yourself to it. All
of us have the capacity of transforming neutral feel-
ings into pleasant feelings, very pleasant feelings that
can last a long time. This is what we practice during
sitting and walking meditation. If you are happy, all
of us will profit from it. Society will profit from it. All
living beings will profit from it.

On the wooden board outside of the meditation
hall in Zen monasteries, there is a four-line inscrip-
tion. The last line is, "Don't waste your life." Our
lives are made of days and hours, and each hour is
precious. Have we wasted our hours and our days?
Are we wasting our lives? These are important ques-
tions. Practicing Buddhism is to be alive in each
moment. When we practice sitting or walking, we
have the means to do it perfectly. During the rest of
the day, we also practice. It is more difficult, but it is
possible. The sitting and the walking must be
extended to the non-walking, non-sitting moments of
our day. That is the basic principle of meditation.
>(· >(· >(-
Perceiving includes our ideas or concepts about
reality. When you look at a pencil, you perceive it,
but the pencil itself may be different from the pencil
in your mind. If you look at me, the me in myself
may be different from the me you perceive. In order
to have a correct perception, we need to have a
direct encounter.
I/Vhen you look at the night sky, you might see a
very beautiful star, and smile at it. But a scientist
may tell you that the star is no longer there, that it
was extinct ten million years ago. So our perception
is not correct. I/Vhen we see a very beautiful sunset,
we are very happy perceiving that the sun is there
with us. In fact it was already behind the mountain
eight minutes ago. It takes eight minutes for the sun-
shine to reach our planet. The hard fact is that we
never see the sun in the present, we only see the sun
of the past. Suppose while walking in the twilight,
you see a snake, and you scream, but when you
shine your flashlight on it, it turns out to be a rope.
This is an error of perception. During our daily lives
we have many misperceptions. lf I don't understand
you, I may be angry at you, all the time. We are not
capable of understanding each other, and that is the
main source of human suffering.
A man was rowing his boat upstream on a very
misty morning. Suddenly, he saw another boat com-
ing downstream, not trying to avoid him. It was
coming straight at him. He shouted, "Be careful! Be
careful!" but the boat came right into him, and his
boat was almost sunk. The man became very angry
and began to shout at the other person, to give him
a piece of his mind. But when he looked closely, he
saw that there was no one in the other boat. It

as risizuixics AND mzcismows
turned out that the boat just got loose and went
downstream. All his anger vanished, and he laughed
and he laughed. If our perceptions are not correct,
they may give us a lot of bad feelings. Buddhism
teaches us how to look at things deeply in order to
understand their own true nature, so that we will not
be misled into suffering and bad feelings.
The Buddha taught that this is like this, because that
is like that. You see? Because you smile, I am happy
This is like this, therefore that is like that. And that is
like that because this is like this. This is called depen-
dent co-arising.
Suppose you and I are friends. (ln fact, I hope we
are friends.) My well-being, my happiness depends
very much on you, and your well-being, your happi-
ness, depends upon me. I am responsible for you,
and you are responsible for me. Anything I do
wrong, you will suffer, and anything you do wrong, I
have to suffer. Therefore, in order to take care of you,
I have to take care of myself.
There is a story in the Pali Canon about a father
and a daughter who performed in the circus. The
father would place a very long bamboo stick on his
forehead, and his daughter would climb to the top
of the stick. When they did this, people gave them
some money to buy rice and curry to eat. One day
the father told the daughter, "My dear daughter,
we have to take care of each other. You have to take

se mama pncr
care of your father, and I have to take care of you, so
that we will be safe. Our performance is very danger-
ous." Because if she fell, both would not be able to
earn their living. If she fell, then broke her leg, they
wouldn't have anything to eat. "My daughter, we
have to take care of each other so we can continue to
earn our living."
The daughter was wise. She said, "Father, you
should say it this way: 'Each one of us has to take
care of himself or herself, so that we can continue to
earn our living.' Because during the performance,
you take care of yourself, you take care of yourself
only You stay very stable, very alert. That will help
me. And if when I climb I take care of myself, I climb
very carefully, I do not let anything wrong happen to
me. That is the way you should say it, Father. You
take good care of yourself, and I take good care of
myself. In that way we can continue to eam our liv-
ing." The Buddha agreed that the daughter was right.
So we are friends, and our happiness depends on
each other. According to that teaching I have to take
care of myself, and you take care of yourself. That
way we help each other. And that is the most correct
perception. If I only say, "Don't do this, you have to
do that," and I don't take care of myself, I can do
many wrong things, and that does not help. I have to
take care of myself, knowing that I am responsible for
your happiness, and if you do the same, everything
will be all right. This is the Buddha's teaching about
perception, based on the principle of dependent co-
arising. Buddhism is easy to learn!

37 marines Amo psncrvriows
The Buddha had a special way to help us under-
stand the object of our perception. He said that in
order to understand, you have to be one with what
you want to understand. This is a way that is practice-
able. About fifteen years ago, I used to help a commit-
tee for orphans, victims of the war in Vietnam. From
Vietnam, they sent out applications, one sheet of
paper with a small picture of a child in the corner,
telling the name, the age, and the conditions of the
orphan. We were supposed to translate it from
Vietnamese into French, English, Dutch, or German, in
order to seek a sponsor, so that the child would have
food to eat and books for school, and be put into the
family of an aunt or an uncle or a grandparent. Then
the committee could send the money to the family
member to help take care of the child.

Each day I helped translate about thirty applications into French. The way I did it was to look at the
picture of the child. I did not read the application, I
just took time to look at the picture of the child.
' Usually after only thirty or forty seconds, I became
one with the child. I don't know how or why, but it's
always like that. Then I would pick up the pen and
translate the words from the application onto another
sheet. Afterwards I realized that it was not I who had
translated the application; it was the child and I, who
had become one. Looking at his face or her face, I got
motivated and I became him and he became me, and
together we did the translation. It is very natural. You
don't have to practice a lot of meditation to be able to
do that. You just look, you allow yourself to be, and
then you lose yourself in the child, and the child in
you. This is one example which illustrates the way of
perception recormnended by Buddha. In order to
understand something, you have to be one with that
something.

The French language has the word comprendre,
which means to understand, to know, to comprehend.
Com means to be one, to be together, and preridre means
to take or to grasp. To understand something is to take
that thing up and to be one with it. The Indians have a
wonderful example. If a grain of salt would like to
measure the degree of saltiness of the ocean, to have a
perception of the saltiness of the ocean, it drops itself
into the ocean and becomes one with it, and the per-
ception is perfect.
Nowadays, nuclear physicists have begun to feel the
same way. When they get deeply into the world of sub-
atomic particles, they see their mind in it. An electron
is first of all your concept of the electron. The object of
your study is no longer separated from your mind.
Your mind is very much in it. Modern physicists think
that the word observer is no longer valid, because an
observer is distinct from the object he observes. They
have discovered that if you retain that kind of distinc-
tion, you cannot go very far in subatomic nuclear sci-
ence. So they have proposed the word participant. You
are not an observer, you are a participant. That is the
way I always feel when I give a lecture. I don't want
the audience to be outside, to observe, to listen only. I
want them to be one with me, to practice, to breathe.
The speaker and the people who listen must become

so marines AND 1¤Er<c12r~noNs
one in order for right perception to take place. Non-
duality means "not two," but "not two" also means
"not one." That is why we say "non-dual" instead of
"one." Because if there is one, there are two. lf you
want to avoid two, you have to avoid one also.
ln the Satipatthumz Sutta, the basic manual on medi-
tation from the time of the Buddha, it is recorded,
"The practitioner will have to contemplate body in the
body feelings in the feelings, mind in the mind,
objects of mind in the objects of mind." The words are
clear. The repetition, "body in the body," is not just to
underline the importance of it. Contemplating body in
the body means that you do not stand outside of
something to contemplate it. You must be one with it,
with no distinction between the contemplator and the
contemplated. Contemplating body in the body means
that you should not look on your body as the object of
your contemplation. You have to be one with it. The
message is clear. Non-duality is the key word for
Buddhist meditation.
>(· >(· >(·
To sit is not enough. We have to be at the same time.
To be what? To be is to be a something, you cannot be
a nothing. To eat, you have to eat something, you can-
not just eat nothing. To be aware is to be aware of
something. To be angry is to be angry at something. So
to be is to be something, and that something is what is
going 011: in your body, in your mind, in your feelings,
and in the world.

40 BEING PEACE
While sitting, you sit and you are. You are what?
You are the breathing. Not only the one who breathes-
you are the breathing and the smiling. It is like a televi-
sion set of one million channels. When you turn the
breathing on, you are the breathing. When you turn the
irritation on, you are the irritation. You are one with it.
Irritation and breathing are not things outside of you.
You contemplate them in them, because you are one
with them.
If I have a feeling of anger, how would I meditate
on that? How would I deal with it, as a Buddhist, or as
an intelligent person? I would not look upon anger as
something foreign to me that I have to fight, to have
surgery in order to remove it. I know that anger is me,
and I am anger. N on-duality not two. I have to deal
with my anger with care, with love, with tenderness,
with nonviolence. Because anger is me, I have to tend
my anger as I would tend a younger brother or sister,
with love, with care, because I myself am anger, I am
in it, I am it. In Buddhism we do not consider anger,
hatred, greed as enemies we have to fight, to destroy
to annihilate. If we annihilate anger, we annihilate our-
selves. Dealing with anger in that way would be like
transforming yourself into a battlefield, tearing yourself
into parts, one part taking the side of Buddha, and one
part taking the side of Mara. If you struggle in that
way, you do violence to yourself. If you cannot be com-
passionate to yourself, you will not be able to be com-
passionate to others. When we get angry we have to
produce awareness: "I am angry. Anger is in me. I am
anger." That is the first thing to do.

41 masimcs AND maracnsmons
In the case of a minor irritation, the recognition of
the presence of the irritation, along with a smile and
a few breaths will usually be enough to transform the
irritation into something more positive, like forgive-
ness, understanding, and love. Irritation is a destruc-
tive energy. We cannot destroy the energy; we can
only convert it into a more constructive energy.
Forgiveness is a constructive energy. Understanding
is a constructive energy. Suppose you are in the
desert, and you only have one glass of muddy water.
You have to transform the muddy water into clear
water to drink, you cannot just throw it away. So you
let it settle for a while, and clear water will appear. In
the same way we have to convert anger into some
kind of energy that is more constructive, because
anger is you. Without anger you have nothing left.
That is the work of meditation.
Earlier I gave the example of a big brother who
got angry at his sister at first and then found out that
she has a fever, and he understood and became con-
cerned, and he tried to help her. So the destructive
energy of anger, because of understanding, is trans-
formed into the energy of love. Meditation on your
anger is first of all to produce awareness of anger, "I
am the anger," and then to look deeply into the
nature of anger. Anger is born from ignorance, and is
a strong ally of ignorance.
>(· SI- >(-
Perceptions are perceptions of our body, feelings,
mind, nature, and society. We should have a good

42 BEING PEACE
perception of the oak tree in order to see its Buddha
nature, its fimction as a Dharma teacher. We have to
perceive our political and economic systems correctly
in order to see what is going wrong. Perception is
very important for our well-being, for our peace.
Perception should be free from emotions and igno-
rance, free from illusions.
In Buddhism, knowledge is regarded as an obsta-
cle to understanding, like a block of ice that obstructs
water from flowing. It is said that if we take one
thing to be the truth and cling to it, even if truth itself
comes in person and knocks at our door, we won't
open it. For things to reveal themselves to us, we
need to be ready to abandon our views about them.
The Buddha told a story about this. A young wid-
ower, who loved his five-year-old son very much,
was away on business, and bandits came, burned
down his whole village, and took his son away.
When the man returned, he saw the ruins, and pan-
icked. He took the charred corpse of an infant to be
his own child, and he began to pull his hair and beat
his chest, crying uncontrollably. He organized a cre-
mation ceremony collected the ashes and put them in
a very beautiful velvet bag. Working, sleeping, eat-
ing, he always carried the bag of ashes with him.
One day his real son escaped from the robbers and
found his way home. He arrived at his father's new
cottage at midnight, and knocked at the door. You
can imagine at that time, the young father was still
carrying the bag of ashes, and crying. He asked,
"Who is there?" And the child answered, "It's me,
Papa. Open the door, it's your son." In his agitated
state of mind the father thought that some mischievous boy was making fun of him, and he shouted at
the child to go away and he continued to cry. The
boy knocked again and again, but the father refused
to let him in. Some time passed, and finally the child
left. From that time on, father and son never saw one
another. After telling this story the Buddha said,
"Sometime, somewhere you take something to be the
truth. If you cling to it so much, when the truth
comes in person and knocks at your door, you will
not open it."

Guarding knowledge is not a good way to understand. Understanding means to throw away your
knowledge. You have to be able to transcend your
knowledge the way people climb a ladder. If you are
on the fifth step of a ladder and think that you are
very high, there is no hope for you to climb to the
sixth. The technique is to release. The Buddhist way
of understanding is always letting go of our views
and knowledge in order to transcend. This is the
most important teaching. That is why I use the image
of water to talk about understanding. Knowledge is
solid; it blocks the way of understanding. Water can
flow, can penetrate.
£=\¢_/

1 V ,'»€'°» % l ,
(.1/
EP  .-. F
4 : ' /
,   _ ,
W r gf. .  
(I F   
, JJ 'j ;~. " {I `1
f·   Y?  II
{E  ‘¤ '
g jg
 

c H A P 1 s n F o u n
The Heart of Practice

Meditation is not to get out of society to escape from society but to
prepare for a reentry into society. We call this "engaged Buddhism."
When we go to a meditation center, we may have the impression that we
leave everything behind &mdash; family society, and all the complications
involved in them &mdash; and come as an individual in order to practice and to
search for peace. This is already an illusion, because in Buddhism
there is no such thing as an individual.

Just as a piece of paper is the fruit, the combination of many elements that can be called non-paper
elements, the individual is made of non-individual
elements. If you are a poet, you will see clearly that
there is a cloud floating in this sheet of paper.
Without a cloud there will be no water; without
water, the trees cannot grow; and without trees, you
cannot make paper. So the cloud is in here. The existence of this page is dependent on the existence
of a cloud. Paper and cloud are so close. Let us think
of other things, like sunshine. Sunshine is very
important because the forest cannot grow without
sunshine, and we humans cannot grow without sunshine. So the logger needs sunshine in order to cut
the tree, and the tree needs sunshine in order to be a
tree. Therefore you can see sunshine in this sheet of
paper. And if you look more deeply, with the eyes of
a bodhisattva, with the eyes of those who are awake,
you see not only the cloud and the sunshine in it, but
that everything is here: the wheat that became the
bread for the logger to eat, the logger's father &mdash; everything is in this sheet of paper.

The Avatamsaku Sutra tells us that you carmot
point to one thing that does not have a relationship
with this sheet of paper. So we say "A sheet of paper
is made of non-paper elements." A cloud is a non-
paper element. The forest is a non-paper element.
Sunshine is a non-paper element. The paper is made
of all the non-paper elements to the extent that if we
return the non-paper elements to their sources, the
cloud to the sky the sunshine to the sun, the logger
to his father, the paper is empty. Empty of what?
Empty of a separate self. It has been made by all
the non-self elements, non-paper elements, and if all
these non-paper elements are taken out, it is truly
empty, empty of an independent self. Empty in
this sense, means that the paper is full of everything, the entire cosmos. The presence of this tiny
sheet of paper proves the presence of the whole
cosmos.

In the same way the individual is made of non-
individual elements. How do you expect to leave
everything behind when you enter a meditation
center? The kind of suffering that you carry in your
heart, that is society itself. You bring that with you,
you bring society with you. You bring all of us with
you. When you meditate, it is not just for yourself,
you do it for the whole society. You seek solutions
to your problems not only for yourself, but for all
of us.
Leaves are usually looked upon as the children of
the tree. Yes, they are children of the tree, born from
the tree, but they are also mothers of the tree. The
leaves combine raw sap, water, and minerals, with
sunshine and gas, and convert it into a variegated
sap that can nourish the tree. In this way the leaves
become the mother of the tree. We are all children of
society but we are also mothers. We have to nourish
society. If we are uprooted from society, we cannot
transform it into a more livable place for us and for
our children. The leaves are linked to the tree by a
stem. The stem is very important.
I have been gardening in our community for many
years, and I know that sometimes it is diffi-cult to
transplant cuttings. Some plants do not trans-plant
easily, so we use a kind of vegetable hormone to help
them be rooted in the soil more easily. I wonder
whether there is a kind of powder, something that

48 mama mxcr
may be found in meditation practice that can help
people who are uprooted be rooted again in society.
Meditation is not an escape from society. Meditation
is to equip oneself with the capacity to reintegrate
into society in order for the leaf to nourish the tree.
>i· X- >(·
Something has happened in some meditation centers.
A number of young people found themselves ill at
ease with society so they left in order to come to a
meditation center. They ignored the reality that they
did not come to the meditation center as an individ-
ual. Coming together in a meditation center, they
form another kind of society. As a society, it has prob-
lems like other societies. Before entering the medita-
tion center, they had hoped that they could find
peace in meditation. Now, practicing and forming
another kind of society they discover that this society
is even more difficult than the larger society. It is
composed of alienated people. After some years, they
feel frustrated, worse than before coming to the med-
itation center. "[his is because we misunderstand
meditation, we misunderstand the purpose of medi-
tation. Meditation is for everyone and not just for the
person who meditates.
Bringing children into a meditation center is very
natural. ln Plum Village, children practice with
adults. From time to time, we open the door for
guests to come and practice with us, and bring their
children. We especially take care of the children.

49 rms HEART or PRACTICE
When the children are happy, the adults are happy.
One day I overheard the children telling each other,
"How come our parents are so nice here?" I have a
friend who has been practicing meditation for four-
teen years, and he has never shown his daughter
how to meditate. You cannot meditate alone. You
have to do it with your children. If your children are
not happy do not smile, you cannot smile. When
you make a peaceful step, that is for you, but it is
also for the children, and for the world.
I think that our society is a difficult place to live.
If we are not careful, we can become uprooted, and
once uprooted, we cannot help change society to
make it more livable. Meditation is a way of helping
us stay in society. This is very important. We have
seen people who are alienated from society and can-
not be reintegrated into society. We know that this
can happen to us if we are not careful.
I have learned that many of the Buddhist practi-
tioners in America are young and intellectual, and
have come to Buddhism not by the door of faith, but
by the door of psychology. I know people in the
Western world suffer a great deal psychologically
and that is why many have become Buddhists, prac-
ticing meditation in order to solve psychological
problems. Many are still in society but some have
been uprooted. Having lived for quite some time in
this society, I myself feel that I cannot get along with
this society very well. There are so many things that
make me want to withdraw, to go back to myself.
But my practice helps me remain in society because

so Brmc msAc1e
I am aware that if I leave society I will not be able to
help change it. I hope that those who are practicing
Buddhism succeed in keeping their feet on earth,
staying in society That is our hope for peace.
¤(· >(· >(·
I wrote a poem over thirty years ago, when I was
twenty-seven or twenty-eight, about a brother who
suffered so much he had to drop out of society and
go to a meditation center. Since the Buddhist Temple
is a place of compassion, they welcomed him. When
someone is suffering so much, when he or she comes
to a meditation center, the first thing is to give some
kind of comfort. The people in the Temple were com-
passionate enough to let him come and have a place
to cry. How long, how many days, how many years
did he need to cry? We don't know. But finally he
took up refuge in the meditation center and did not
want to go back to society. He had had enough of it.
He thought that he had found some peace, but one
day I myself came and burned his meditation center,
which was only a small hut: his last shelter! In his
understanding, he had nothing else outside of that
small cottage. He had nowhere to go because society
was not his. He thought he had come to seek his own
emancipation, but, in the light of Buddhism, there is
no such thing as individual self. As we know, when
you go into a Buddhist center, you bring with you all
the scars, all the wounds from society and you bring
the whole society as well. In this poem, I am the

51 mi; HEART or PRACTICE
young man, and I am also the person who came and
burned down the cottage.
If you ask how much do I want,
I'll tell you that I want it all.
This morning, you and I
and all men
A are flowing into the marvelous stream
of oneness.
Small pieces of imagination as we are,
we have come a long way to find ourselves
and for ourselves, in the dark, the illusion
of emancipation.
This morning, my brother is back from his
long adventure.
He kneels before the altar,
his eyes full of tears.
His soul is longing for a shore to set anchor at
(a yearning I once had).
Let him kneel there and weep.
Let him cry his heart out.
Let him have his refuge there for a thousand years,
enough to dry all his tears.
One night, I will come
and set fire to his shelter,
the small cottage on the hill.
My fire will destroy everything
and remove his only life raft after a shipwreck.

sz BEING PEACE
In the utmost anguish of his soul,
the shell will break.
The light of the burning hut will witness
his glorious deliverance.
I will wait for him
beside the burning cottage.
Tears will run down my cheeks.
I will be there to contemplate his new being.
And as I hold his hands in mine
and ask him how much he wants,
he will smile and say that he wants it all--
just as I did.
To me, a meditation center is where you get back to
yourself, you get a clearer understanding of reality,
you get more strength in understanding and love,
and you prepare for your reentry into society. If it is
not like that, it is not a real meditation center. As we
develop real understanding, we can reenter society
and make a real contribution.
>(- >(· >(·
We have many compartments in our lives. When we
practice sitting meditation and when we do not prac-
tice sitting, these two periods of time are so different
from each other. While sitting, we practice intensively
and while we are not sitting, we do not practice
intensively. In fact, we practice non-practice inten-
sively. There is a wall which separates the two, prac-

sz rm; HEART or PRACTICE
ticing and non-practicing. Practicing is only for the
practice period and non-practicing is only for the
non-practicing period. How can we mix the two
together? How can we bring meditation out of the
meditation hall and into the kitchen, and the office?
How can the sitting influence the non-sitting time? If
a doctor gives you an injection, not only your arm
but your whole body benefits from it. If you practice
one hour of sitting a day, that hour should be all
twenty-four hours, and not just for that hour. One
smile, one breath should be for the benefit of the
whole day, not just for that moment. We must prac-
tice in a way that removes the barrier between prac-
tice and non-practice.
When we walk in the meditation hall, we make
careful steps, very slowly. But when we go to the air-
port, we are quite another person. We walk very dif-
ferently less mindfully. How can we practice at the
airport and in the market? That is engaged
Buddhism. Engaged Buddhism does not only mean
to use Buddhism to solve social and political prob-
lems, protesting against the bombs, and protesting
against social injustice. First of all we have to bring
Buddhism into our daily lives. I have a friend who
breathes between telephone calls, and it helps her
very much. Another friend does walking meditation
between business appointments, walking mindfully
between buildings in downtown Denver. Passersby
smile at him, and his meetings, even with difficult
persons, often turn out to be very pleasant, and very
successful.

54 memo 1>1sAcr
We should be able to bring the practice from the
meditation hall into our daily lives. How can we
practice to penetrate our feelings, our perceptions
during daily life? We don't deal with our perceptions
and our feelings only during sitting practice. We have
to deal with them all the time. We need to discuss
among ourselves how to do it. Do you practice
breathing between phone calls? Do you practice smil-
ing while cutting carrots? Do you practice relaxation
after hours of hard work? These questions are very
practical. If you know how to apply Buddhism to
dinner time, leisure time, sleeping time, I think
Buddhism will become engaged in your daily life.
Then it will have a tremendous effect on social con-
cerns. Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha become the mat-
ters of everyday life, each minute, each hour of our
daily life, and not just a description of something far
away.
>(· 4- >(·
Our mind is like a river, with many thoughts and
feelings flowing along. From time to time, it is help-
ful to recite a gatha, a short verse, to remind us
what is going on. When we focus our mind on a
gatha, the gatha is our mind at that moment. The
gatha fills our mind for half a second, or ten seconds,
or one minute, and then we may have another gatha
a little further downstream. While eating a silent
meal, I recite a gatha to myself, and then I eat some-

ss rms HEART or PRACTICE
thing. When the plate is empty I recite another gatha,
and drink a cup of tea. Suppose there is one hour of
sitting in meditation, and then five hours of non-sit-
ting, followed by three more hours of sitting, inten-
sive practice. What is the relationship between the
practice time and the non-practice time, the practice
mind and the non-practice mind? Sitting is like a
gatha, a long silent gatha. (Maybe it's not so silent.)
My main concern is the effect the gatha has on the
non-gatha state of mind.
An automobile driver will need signs from time to
time to show him the way. The sign and the road are
one, because you don't see the sign only where it
appears, you see it all along the way, until the next
sign. There is no difference between the signs and the
road. That is what we should do while practicing
gathas and sitting. Gathas help us get back to our-
selves, and as soon as the gatha ends, we continue
along the stream. If we do not realize the tmity of the
gathas and the rest of our life, between the signs and
the road, then we would have in ourselves what the
French call cloisons étanches. It means absolute com-
partmentalization, with no commtmication whatso-
ever between the two compartments. Not permeable.
Between the gatha and the non-gatha state of mind is
an absolute distinction, like the sitting and the non-
sitting.
How can the gathas affect the non-gatha
moments? How will the sitting permeate the non-
sitting hours? We must learn to practice so that one

se memo mace
gatha, one minute of sitting will influence the rest of
the day one step made in walking meditation will
have an effect on the rest of the day. Every action,
every thought has an effect. Even if I just clap my
hands, the effect is everywhere, even in faraway
galaxies. Every sitting, every walking, every smile
will have an effect on your own daily life, and the life
of other people also, and practice must be based on
that.
>(· >l- >(·
When we practice sitting and walking, we must pay
attention to the quality of the sitting and the walking,
not the quantity We have to practice intelligently. We
need to create the kind of practice that will fit our
circumstance.
There is a story I would like to tell you about a
woman who practices the invocation of the Buddha
Amitabha's name. She is very tough, and she prac-
tices the invocation three times daily using a wooden
drum and a bell, reciting "Namo Amitabha Buddha"
for one hour each time. When she arrives at one
thousand times, she invites the bell to sound. (In
Vietnamese, we don't say "strike" or "hit" a bell.)
Although she has been doing this for ten years, her
personality has not changed. She is still quite mean,
shouting at people all the time.
A friend wanted to teach her a lesson, so one after-
noon when she had just lit the incense, invited the

57 THE HEART OF PRACTICE
bell to sound three times, and was beginning to recite
"Namo Amitabha Buddha," he came to her door, and
said, "Mrs. Nguyen, Mrs. Nguyen!" She found it very
annoying because this was her time of practice, but
he just stood at the front gate shouting her name. She
said to herself, "I have to struggle against my anger,
so I will ignore that," and she went on, "Namo
Amitabha Buddha, Namo Amitabha Buddha."
The gentleman continued to shout her name, and
her anger became more and more oppressive. She
struggled against it, wondering, "Should I stop my
recitation and go and give him a piece of my mind?"
But she continued chanting, and she struggled very
hard. Fire mounted in her, but she still tried to chant
"Namo Amitabha Buddha." The gentleman knew it,
and he continued to shout, "Mrs. Nguyen! Mrs.
Nguyen!"
She could not bear it any longer. She threw away
the bell and the drum. She slammed the door, went
out to the gate and said, "Why why do you behave
like that? I/Vhy do you call my name hundreds of
times like that?" The gentleman smiled at her and
said, "I just called your name for ten minutes, and
you are so angry. You have been calling the Buddha's
name for ten years. Think how angry he must be by
now!"
The problem is not to do a lot, but to do it cor-
rectly. If you do it correctly you become kinder, nicer,
more understanding and loving. I/Vhen we practice
sitting or walking we should pay attention to the

58 BEING PEACE
quality and not the quantity. If we practice only for
the quantity, then we are not very different from Mrs.
Nguyen. I think she learned her lesson. I think she
did better after that.
£=\¢_/

5 /4)
`ix 7 ··   /“
 "`i*·A ....>$  qw
 

C H A P T E R F I V E
Workingfor Peace
In Plum Village in France, we receive many letters
from the refugee camps in Singapore, Malaysia,
Indonesia, Thailand, and the Philippines, hundreds
each week. It is very painful to read them, but we
have to do it, we have to be in contact. We try our
best to help, but the suffering is enormous, and some-
times we are discouraged. It is said that half the boat
people die in the ocean; only half arrive at the shores
in Southeast Asia.
There are many young girls, boat people, who are
raped by sea pirates. Even though the United Nations
and many countries try to help the government of
Thailand prevent that kind of piracy, sea pirates con-
tinue to inflict much suffering on the refugees. One
day we received a letter telling us about a young girl
on a small boat who was raped by a Thai pirate.

ez nemo ms/acs
She was only twelve, and she jumped into the ocean
and drowned herself.
When you first learn of something like that, you
get angry at the pirate. You naturally take the side of
the girl. As you look more deeply you will see it dif-
ferently. If you take the side of the little girl, then it
is easy. You only have to take a gun and shoot the
pirate. But we cannot do that. In my meditation I
saw that if I had been born in the village of the
pirate and raised in the same conditions as he was, I
am now the pirate. There is a great likelihood that I
would become a pirate. I cannot condemn myself so
easily. In my meditation, I saw that many babies are
born along the Gulf of Siam, hundreds every day
and if we educators, social workers, politicians, and
others do not do something about the situation, in
twenty-five years a number of them will become sea
pirates. That is certain. If you or I were born today
in those fishing villages, we might become sea
pirates in twenty-five years. If you take a gun and
shoot the pirate, you shoot all of us, because all of us
are to some extent responsible for this state of
affairs.
After a long meditation, I wrote this poem. In it,
there are three people: the twelve-year-old girl, the
pirate, and me. Can we look at each other and recog-
nize ourselves in each other? The title of the poem is
"Please Call Me By My True Names," because I have
so many names. When I hear one of these names, I
have to say, "Yes."

ez WORKING ron mics
D0 not say that I'll depart tomorrow
because even today I still arrive.
Look deeply: I arrive in every second
to be a bud on a spring branch,
to be a tiny bird, with wings still fragile,
learning to sing in my new nest,
to be a caterpillar in the heart of flower,
to be a jewel hiding itself in a stone.
I still arrive, in order to laugh and to cry,
in order to fear and to hope,
the rhythm of my heart is the birth and
death of all that are alive.
I am the mayfly metamorphosing
on the surface of the river,
and I am the bird which, when spring comes,
arrives in time to eat the mayfly.
I am the frog swimming happily
in the clear water of a pond,
and I am also the grass-snake who,
approaching in silence,
feeds itself on the frog.
I am the child in Uganda, all skin and bones,
my legs as thin as bamboo sticks,
and I am the arms merchant,
selling deadly weapons to Uganda.

64 same PEACE
I am the twelve-year-old girl,
refugee on a small boat,
who throws herself into the ocean
after being raped by a sea pirate,
and I am the pirate, my heart not yet capable
of seeing and loving.
I am a member of the politburo,
with plenty of power in my hands,
and I am the man who has to pay his
"debt of blood" to my people,
dying slowly in a forced labor camp.
My joy is like spring, so warm
it makes flowers bloom in all walks of life.
My pain is like a river of tears, so full
it fills up the four oceans.
Please call me by my true names,
so I can hear all my cries and my laughs at once,
_ so I can see that my joy and pain are one.
Please call me by my true names,
so I can wake up,
and so the door of my heart can be left open,
the door of compassion.

65 WORKING Fon PEACE
There is a Zen story about a man riding a horse that
is galloping very quickly. Another man, standing
alongside the road, yells at him, "Where are you
going?" and the man on the horse yells back, "I don't
know. Ask the horse." I think that is our situation. We
are riding many horses that we cannot control. The
proliferation of armaments, for instance, is a horse.
We have tried our best, but we cannot control these
horses. Our lives are so busy.
In Buddhism, the most important precept of all is
to live in awareness, to know what is going on. To
know what is going on, not only here, but there. For
instance, when you eat a piece of bread, you may
choose to be aware that our farmers, in growing the
wheat, use chemical poisons a little too much. Eating
the bread, we are somehow co-responsible for the
destruction of our ecology. When we eat a piece of
meat or drink alcohol, we can produce awareness
that 40,000 children die each day in the Third World
from hunger and that in order to produce a piece of
meat or a bottle of liquor, we have to use a lot of
grain. Eating a bowl of cereal may be more reconcil-
ing with the suffering of the world than eating a
piece of meat. An authority on economics who lives
in France told me that if only the people in Western
countries would reduce the eating of meat and the
drinking of alcohol by 50 percent, that would be
enough to change the situation of the world. Only 50
percent less.
Every day we do things, we are things, that have
to do with peace. If we are aware of our lifestyle, our
way of consuming, of looking at things, we will

66 srmc 1=1aAcE
know how to make peace right in the moment we
are alive, the present moment. When we pick up the
Sunday newspaper, for instance, we may be aware
that it is a very heavy edition, maybe three or four
pounds. To print such a paper, a whole forest may
be needed. I/Vhen we pick up the paper, we should
be aware. If we are very aware, we can do some-
thing to change the course of things.
>(· ¢|· X-
In my temple, I was the first monk to ride a bicycle.
At that time, there were no gathas to recite while
riding on a bicycle. We have to practice intelligently
to keep the practice up to date, so recently I wrote a
gatha you can use before you start your car. I hope
you will find it helpful:
Before starting the car,
I know where I am going.
The car and I are one.
If the car goes fast, I go fast.
Sometimes we don't really need to use the car, but
because we want to get away from ourselves, we go
down and start the car. If we recite the gatha,
"Before starting the car, I know where I am going,"
it can be like a flashlight-we may see that we don't
need to go anywhere. Anywhere we go, we will
have our self with us; we cannot escape ourselves.
Sometimes it is better to turn the engine off and go

67 WORKING ron mics
out for a walking meditation. It may be more pleas-
ant to do that.
It is said that in the last few years, two million
square miles of forest land have been destroyed by
acid rain, and that is partly because of our cars.
"Before starting the car, I know where I am going," is
a very deep question. "Where shall I go? To my own
destruction?" If the trees die, humans are going to die
also. If trees and animals are not alive, how can we
be alive?
"The car and I are one." We have the impression
that we are the boss, and the car is only an instru-
ment, but that is not true. With the car, we become
something different. With a gun, we become very
dangerous. With a flute, we become pleasant. With
50,000 atomic bombs, humankind has become the
most dangerous species on earth. We were never so
dangerous as we are now. We should be aware. The
most basic precept of all is to be aware of what we
do, what we are, each minute. Every other precept
will follow from that.
>|- I- ¤(·
We have to look deeply at things in order to see.
I/Vhen a swimmer enjoys the clear water of the river,
he or she should also be able to be the river. One day
I was having lunch at Boston University with some
friends, and I looked down at the Charles River. I
had been away from home for quite a long time, and
seeing the river, I found it very beautiful. So I left

as BEING PEACE
my friends and went down to wash my face and dip
my feet in the water, as we used to do in our country.
When I returned, a professor said, "That's a very
dangerous thing to do. Did you rinse your mouth in
the river?" When I told him, "Yes," he said, "You
should see a doctor and get a shot."
I was shocked. I didn't know that the rivers here
are so polluted. You may call them dead rivers. In
our country the rivers get very muddy sometimes,
but not that kind of dirt. Someone told me that there
are so many chemicals in the Rhine River in Germany
that it is possible to develop photographs in it. We
can be good swimmers, but can we be a river and
experience the fears and hopes of a river? If we can-
not, then we do not have the chance for peace. If all
the rivers are dead, then the joy of swimming in the
river will no longer exist.
If you are a mountain climber or someone who
enjoys the countryside, or the green forest, you know
that the forests are our lungs outside of our bodies.
Yet we have been acting in a way that has allowed
two million square miles of forest land to be de-
stroyed by acid rain. We are imprisoned in our small
selves, thinking only of the comfortable conditions
for this small self, while we destroy our large self.
One day I suddenly saw that the sun is my heart, my
heart outside of this body. If my body's heart ceases
to function I cannot survive; but if the sun, my other
heart, ceases to function, I will also die immediately.
We should be able to be our true self. That means
we should be able to be the river, we should be able

69 woR1<1Nc ron PEACE
to be the forest, we should be able to be a Soviet citi-
zen. We must do this to understand, and to have
hope for the future. That is the non-dualistic way of
seeing.
¢¢· >(- >|·
During the war in Vietnam we young Buddhists or-
ganized ourselves to help victims of the war rebuild
villages that had been destroyed by the bombs.
Many of us died during service, not only because of
the bombs and the bullets, but because of the people
who suspected us of being on the other side. We were
able to understand the suffering of both sides, the
communists and the anti-communists. We tried to be
open to both, to understand this side and to under-
stand that side, to be one with them. That is why we
did not take a side, even though the whole world
took sides. We tried to tell people our perception of
the situation: that we wanted to stop the fighting, but
the bombs were so loud. Sometimes we had to burn
ourselves alive to get the message across, but even
then the world could not hear us. They thought we
were supporting a kind of political act. They didn":
know that it was a purely human action to be heard,
to be understood. We wanted reconciliation, we did
not want a victory. Working to help people in a
circumstance like that is very dangerous, and many
of us got killed. The communists killed us because
they suspected that we were working with the
Americans, and the anti-communists killed us be-

70 mama mics
cause they thought that we were with the commu-
nists. But we did not want to give up and take one
side.
The situation of the world is still like this. People
completely identify with one side, one ideology. To
understand the suffering and the fear of a citizen of
the Soviet Union, we have to become one with him or
her. To do so is dangerous-we will be suspected by
both sides. But if we don't do it, if we align ourselves
with one side or the other, we will lose our chance to
work for peace. Reconciliation is to understand both
sides, to go to one side and describe the suffering
being endured by the other side, and then to go to the
other side and describe the suffering being endured
by the first side. Doing only that will be a great help
for peace.
During a retreat at the Providence Zen Center, I
asked someone to express himself as a swimmer in a
river, and then after fifteen minutes of breathing, to
express himself as the river. He had to become the
river to be able to express himself in the language and A
feelings of the river. After that a woman who had
been in the Soviet Union was asked to express herself
as an American, and after some breathing and medita-
tion, as a Soviet citizen, with all her fears and her
hope for peace. She did it wonderfully These are exer-
cises of meditation related to non-duality
The young Buddhist workers in Vietnam tried to
do this kind of meditation. Many of them died during
service. I wrote a poem for my young brothers and

71 WORKING Fon PEACE
sisters on how to die nonviolently without hatred. It
is called "Recommendation":
Promise me,
promise me this day,
promise me now,
while the sun is overhead
exactly at the zenith,
promise me:
Even as they
strike you down
with a mountain of hatred and violence;
even as they step on you and crush you
like a worm,
even as they dismember and disembowel you,
remember, brother,
remember:
man is not our enemy.
The only thing worthy of you is compassion-
invincible, limitless, unconditional.
Hatred will never let you face
the beast in man.
One day when you face this beast alone,
with your courage intact, your eyes kind,
untroubled
(even as no one sees them),
out of your smile
will bloom a flower.

72 Brmc mmcis
And those who love you
will behold you
across ten thousand worlds of birth and dying.
Alone again,
I will go on with bent head,
knowing that love has become eternal.
On the long, rough road,
the sun and the moon
will continue to shine.
To practice meditation is to be aware of the existence
of suffering. The first Dharma talk that the Buddha
gave was about suffering, and the way out of suffer-
ing. In South Africa, the black people suffer enor-
mously but the white people also suffer. If we take
one side, we cannot fulfill our task of reconciliation in
order to bring about peace.
Are there people who can be in touch with both
the black community and the white community in
South Africa? If there are not many of them, the situ-
ation is bad. There must be people who can get in
touch with both sides, understanding the suffering of
each, and telling each side about the other. Are there
people doing that kind of understanding and media-
tion and reconciliation between the two major politi-
cal blocs on the earth? Can you be more than
Americans? Can you be people who understand
deeply the suffering of both sides? Can you bring the
message of reconciliation?

73 WORKING Fon PEACE
X- $(· >(·
You may not be aware that your country has been
manufacturing a lot of conventional weapons to sell
to Third World countries for their people to kill each
other. You know very well that children and adults in
these countries need food more than these deadly
weapons. Yet no one has the time to organize a
national debate to look at the problem of manufactur-
ing and selling these deadly things. Everyone is too
busy. Conventional weapons have been killing in the
last thirtv forty, fifty years, very much. If we only
think of the nuclear bombs that may explode in the
future and do not pay attention to the bombs that are
exploding in the present moment, we commit some
kind of error. I believe President Reagan said that the
U.S. has to continue to make conventional weapons
to sell because if you don't, someone else will and the
U.S. will lose its interest. This is not a good thing to
say. It is off course. This statement is just an excuse,
but there are real factors that push him and push the
whole nation to continue to manufacture conven-
tional weapons to sell. For instance, many people will
lose their jobs if they stop. Have we thought about
the kind of work that will help these people if the
weapons industry stops?
Not many Americans are aware that these
weapons are killing people in the Third World every
day. The Congress has not debated this issue seri-
ously. We have not taken the time to see this situation
clearly, so we have not been able to change our gov-
ernment's policy. We are not strong enough to pres-

74 same mic;
sure the government. The foreign policy of a govern-
ment is largely dictated by its people and their way
of life. We have a large responsibility as citizens. We
think that the government is free to make policy but
that freedom depends on our daily life. If we make it
possible for them to change policies, they will do it.
Now it is not yet possible. Maybe you think that if
you get into government and obtain power, you can
do anything you want, but that is not true. If you
become president, you will be confronted by this
hard fact. You will probably do just the same thing, a
little better or a little worse.
Therefore we have to see the real truth, the real sit-
uation. Our daily lives, the way we drink, what we
eat, has to do with the world's political situation.
Meditation is to see deeply into things, to see how we
can change, how we can transform our situation. To
transform our situation is also to transform our
minds. To transform our minds is also to transform
our situation, because the situation is mind, and
mind is situation. Awakening is important. The
nature of the bombs, the nature of injustice, the
nature of the weapons, and the nature of our own
beings are the same. This is the real meaning of
engaged Buddhism.
X- >|· >(·
During the last 2,500 years in Buddhist monasteries, a
system of seven practices of reconciliation has
evolved. Although these techniques were formulated

75 woaxmc ron 1>1aAcE
to settle disputes within the circle of monks, I think
they might also be of use in our households and in
our society
The first practice is Face-to-Face Sitting. In a con-
vocation of the whole sangha, everyone sits together
mindfully breathing and smiling, with the willing-
ness to help, and not with the willingness to fight.
This is basic. The two conflicting monks are present,
and they know that everyone in the community
expects them to make peace. Even before anything is
said, the atmosphere of peace is already present.
People refrain from listening to stories outside of the
assembly spreading news about this monk or other
monks, commenting on the behavior of this monk or
the other monks. That would not help. Everything
must be said in public, in the community. So the two
monks are sitting facing each other, breathing and,
how hard, smiling.
The second practice is Remembrance. Both monks
try to remember the whole history of the conflict,
every detail having to do with the conflict, while the
whole assembly just sits patiently and listens: "I
remember that that day it was rainy and I went to
the kitchen and you were there. . . ," telling as much
he can recall. This is quite important, because the
monks are trying to mend the things of the past. The
principle of sangha life is to be aware of what is
going on every day. If you are not aware of what is
going on, one day things will explode, and it will be
too late. If the commtmity is sitting in assembly and
there are two monks confronting each other, already

76 memo PEACE
the conflict has exploded into the open. To sit and try
to recall details from the past is the only thing to do
now, as far as the past is concerned.
Suppose a woman and a man get married and
then live a neglectful life, not knowing what is really
going on subconsciously. Their feelings and their
perceptions are creating a dangerous situation. Some-
times things occur beneath the surface that will even-
tually explode, and by then it is too late to deal with
them, so the only recourse is divorce or fighting or
even killing each other. To meditate is to be aware of
what is going on in yourself, your feelings, your
body your perceptions, your family. This is very
important for any kind of life. The second technique
is to recall, and the more details which the commu-
nity has, the easier it is to help.
The third principle is Non-stubbomness.
Everyone in the community expects the two monks
not to be stubborn, to try their best for reconciliation.
The outcome is not important. The fact that each
monk is doing his best to show his willingness for
reconciliation and understanding is most important.
When you do your best, trying to be your best in
understanding and accepting, you don't have to
worry about the outcome. You do your best, and that
is enough. The other person will do his or her best.
The atmosphere of the assembly is crucial. Because
everyone has high expectations for the two monks,
they know they must act well or they will not be rec-
ognized as brothers.

77 WORKING Fora PEACE
The fourth practice is Covering Mud with Straw.
You know when you walk in the countryside after a
rain, it is very muddy. lf you have straw to spread
over the mud, you can walk safely. One respected
senior monk is appointed to represent each side of
the conflict. These two monks then address the
assembly trying to say something to de-escalate the
feeling in the concerned people. In a Buddhist
sangha, people respect the high monks. We call them
ancestral teachers. They don't have to say very much;
whatever they say is taken very seriously by the rest
of the community. One says something concerning
this monk, and what he says will cause the other
monk to understand better and de-escalate his feel-
ing, his anger or his resistance. Then the other high
monk says something to protect the other monk, say-
ing it in a way that the first monk feels better. By
doing so, they dissipate the hard feelings in the
hearts of the two monks and help them to accept the
verdict proposed by the community. Putting straw on
mud- the mud is the dispute, and the straw is the
lovingkindness of the Dharma.
The next stage is Voluntary Confession. Each
monk reveals his own shortcomings, without waiting
A for others to say them. If the others say them, you
feel differently. If you yourself say them, it is wonder-
ful. First you reveal a minor weakness. You may have
a big weakness, but you tell only of some minor
transgression. (There is an art in all that.) As you
make a confession, you might say, "On that day I

78 memo r>EAc1s
was not very mindful. I said such and such a thing.
That is horrible. I am sorry" Even though it is a very
minor confession, it helps the other person feel better.
It encourages him to confess something of the same
magnitude. (Imagine the Soviet Union and the
United States trying to slowly de-escalate the small
things.)
This atmosphere is encouraging. Everyone is sup-
portive, expecting that de-escalation will be realized.
The Buddha nature in each monk has the opportu-
nity to come out, and the pressure on each monk
from his anger or resentment will lighten. In this kind
of atmosphere, the capacity of mutual understanding
and acceptance will be born. Then the senior monks
remind the feuding monks, "First of all you are part
of the community. The well-being of the community
is most important. Don't think only of your own feel-
ing. Think of the well-being of the community." And
then each monk will be ready to make a sacrifice, and
get ready to accept the verdict or decision made by
the community
The sixth and seventh practices are Decision by
Consensus and Accepting the Verdict. It is agreed in
advance that the two monks will accept whatever
verdict is pronounced by the whole assembly, or they
will have to leave the community So, after exploring
every detail of the conflict, after realizing the maxi-
mum of reconciliation, a committee presents a ver-
dict. It is announced three times. The head of the
community reads the decision in this way: "After
meditation, after exploration, after discussion, after

79 WORKING Fon mics
all efforts have been made, it is suggested that this
monk will do so and so, that monk will do so and so,
this should be repaired in this way, that should be
repaired in that way Does the assembly of monks
accept this verdict?" If the community remains silent,
that means, "Okay." Then he repeats exactly the same
words, "Does the noble assembly accept this ver-
dict?" And then, silence. And a third time, "Does the
community accept this verdict?" After a third time of
silence, he pronounces, "The noble community of
monks and nuns has accepted the verdict. Please,
both sides carry out the decision." This is the end of
the session. There may be many sessions to solve one
case. If one of the monks rebels against the verdict,
his voice is of no weight, because he has already
agreed to obey any verdict made by the assembly.
These seven methods of settling disputes have
been adopted by Buddhist monks and nuns in India,
China, Vietnam, Japan, Korea, and many other coun-
tries for more than 2,500 years. I think we can learn
something from them to apply in our own house-
holds and society.
>|· >(· >(-
In the peace movement there is a lot of anger, frustra-
tion, and misunderstanding. The peace movement
can write very good protest letters, but they are not
yet able to write a love letter. We need to learn to
write a letter to the Congress or to the president of
the United States that they will want to read, and not

so memo r>1aAc1s
just throw away. The way you speak, the kind of
understanding, the kind of language you use should
not turn people off. The president is a person like any
of us.
Can the peace movement talk in loving speech,
showing the way for peace? I think that will depend
on whether the people in the peace movement can be
peace. Because without being peace, we cannot do
anything for peace. If we cannot smile, we cannot
help other people to smile. If we are not peaceful,
then we cannot contribute to the peace movement.
I hope we can bring a new dimension to the peace
movement. The peace movement is filled with anger
and hatred. It cannot fulfill the path we expect from
them. A fresh way of being peace, of doing peace is
needed. That is why it is so important for us to prac-
tice meditation, to acquire the capacity to look, to see,
and to understand. It would be wonderful if we
could bring to the peace movement our contribution,
our way of looking at things, that will diminish
aggression and hatred. Peace work means, first of all,
being peace. Meditation is meditation for all of us.
We rely on each other. Our children are relying on us
in order for them to have a future.
£:\¢../

  \\ 
m ¤ W:}
   9  `Qx
   V   J   
Q-{Q I   f _/

c H A P 1 E R s • x
In terbeing
Ibelieve that the encounter between Buddhism and
the West will bring about something very exciting,
very important. There are important values in
Western society such as the scientific way of looking
at things, the spirit of free inquiry, and democracy. If
there is an encounter between Buddhism and these
values, hiunankind will have something very new,
very exciting. Let us look at some examples: Printing
was invented in China and movable metal type was
invented in Korea, but when the West began printing,
it became a very important means for communication.
Gunpowder was discovered by the Chinese, but
when it came to be manufactured by Westerners, it
changed the face of the Earth. And the tea that was
discovered in Asia, when brought to the West, has
become tea bags. lNhen combined with the Western
way of doing things, the Buddhist principle of seeing

84 BEING PEACE
and acting non-dualistically will totally change our
way of life. The role of American Buddhists in bring-
ing Buddhism into the encounter with Western civili-
zation is very important for all of us.
Buddhism is not one. The teaching of Buddhism is
many. When Buddhism enters one country that coun-
try always acquires a new form of Buddhism. The first
time I visited Buddhist communities in this country I
asked a friend, "Please show me your Buddha, your
American Buddha." The question surprised my friend,
because he thought that the Buddha is universal. In
fact, the Chinese have a Chinese Buddha, Tibetans
have a Tibetan Buddha, and also the teaching is differ-
ent. The teaching of Buddhism in this country is differ-
ent from in other countries. Buddhism, in order to be
Buddhism, must be suitable, appropriate to the psy-
chology and the culture of the society that it serves.
My question was a very simple question. "Where is
your Bodhisattva? Show me an American Bodhi-
sattva." My friend was not capable of doing that.
"Show me an American monk, an American nun, or an
American Buddhist Center." All these things are not
apparent yet. I think we can learn from other Buddhist
traditions, but you have to create your own Buddhism.
I believe that out of deep practice you will have your
own Buddhism very soon.
>(· ¤(· >l·
I would like to present to you a form of Buddhism that
may be accepted here in the West. In the past twenty
years we have been experimenting with this form of
Buddhism, and it seems that it may be suitable for our

ss INTERBEING
modern society. It is called the Tiep Hien Order, the
Order of "Interbeing."
The Tiep Hien Order was founded in Vietnam dur-
ing the war. It derives from the Zen School of Lin Chi,
and is the forty-second generation of this school. It is a
form of engaged Buddhism, Buddhism in daily life, in
society, and not just in a retreat center. Tiep and hien are
Vietnamese words of Chinese origin. I would like to
explain the meaning of these words, because under-
standing them helps in understanding the spirit of this
order.
Tiep means "to be in touch." The notion of engaged
Buddhism already appears in the word tiep. First of
all, to be in touch with oneself. In modern society most
of us don't want to be in touch with ourselves; we
want to be in touch with other things like religion,
sports, politics, a book-we want to forget ourselves.
Anytime we have leisure, we want to invite something
else to enter us, opening ourselves to the television
and telling the television to come and colonize us. So
first of all, "in touch" means in touch with oneself in
order to find out the source of wisdom, understanding,
and compassion in each of us. Being in touch with one-
self is the meaning of meditation, to be aware of what
is going on in your body in your feelings, in your
mind. That is the first meaning of tiep.
Tiep also means to be in touch with Buddhas and
bodhisattvas, the enlightened people in whom full
understanding and compassion are tangible and effec-
tive. Being in touch with oneself means being in touch
with this source of wisdom and compassion. You
know that children understand that the Buddha is in

ss memo mics
themselves. One young boy claimed to be a Buddha
on the first day of a retreat in Ojai, California. I told
him that this is partly true, because sometimes he is
Buddha, but sometimes he is not; it depends on his
degree of being awake.
The second part of the meaning of tiep is "to con-
tinue," to make something more long-lasting. It means
that the career of understanding and compassion
started by Buddhas and bodhisattvas should be con-
tinued. This is possible only if we get in touch with
our true self, which is like digging deep into the soil
until we reach a hidden source of fresh water, and
then the well is filled. When we are in touch with our
true mind, the source of understanding and compas-
sion will spring out. This is the basis of everything.
Being in touch with our true mind is necessary for the
continuation of the career started by the Buddhas and
bodhisattvas.
Hien means "the present time." We have to be in
the present time, because only the present is real, only
in the present moment can we be alive. We do not
practice for the sake of the future, to be reborn in a
paradise, but to be peace, to be compassion, to be joy
right now. Hien also means "to make real, to manifest,
realization." Love and understanding are not only
concepts and words. They must be real things, real-
ized, in oneself and in society That is the meaning of
the word hien.
It is difficult to find English or French words which
convey the same meaning as Tiep Hien. There is a term
from the Avatumsaka Sutra, "interbeing," that conveys
the spirit, so we have translated Tiep Hien as interbe-

87 rwrsmsmwc
ing. In the sutra it is a compound term which means
"mutua1" and "to be." Interbeing is a new word in
English, and I hope it will be accepted. We have talked
about the many in the one, and the one containing the
many. In one sheet of paper, we see everything else, the
cloud, the forest, the logger. I am, therefore you are.
You are, therefore I am. That is the meaning of the
word "interbeing." We interare.
In the Order of Interbeing, there are two communi-
ties. The Core Commtmity consists of lay and monastic
men and women who have taken the vow to observe
the Fourteen Mindfulness Trainings of the Order.
Before being ordained as a brother or a sister of the
Order of Interbeing, one should practice at least one
year in this way. Upon ordination, the person has to
organize a community around himself or herself in
order to continue the practice. That community is
called the Extended Community. This means all those
who practice exactly the same way but have not taken
the vow, have not been ordained into the Core
Community.
The lay people who are ordained into the Core
Community do not have any special sign at all. They
don't shave their heads, they do not have a special
robe, except sometimes they wear a brown jacket.
What makes them different is that they observe a num-
ber of rules, one of which is to practice at least sixty
days of retreat, days of mindfulness, each year,
whether consecutively or divided into several periods.
If they practice every Sunday, for instance, they will
have fifty-two already. The people in the Extended
Community can do that, or more, even if they don't

88 Brmc mic};
want to be ordained. In the Core Commtmity people
can choose to observe celibacy or lead a family life.
At least once every two weeks, members and
friends come together and recite the Fourteen
Mindfuhiess Trainings. They begin with the three
refuges and the two promises for children. These two
promises envelop all the mindfuhiess trainings of the
adults. The first promise is: "I vow to develop my com-
passion in order to love and protect the life of people,
animals, plants, and minerals." The second promise is:
"I vow to develop understanding in order to be able to
love and to live in harmony with people, animals,
plants, and minerals." So the two promises are com-
passion, or love, and understanding. They are the
essence of the Buddha's teaching. After the children
recite the three refuges and these two promises, they
can go outside and play; and the adults recite their
Fourteen Mindfulness Trainings.
Until recently I have used the term "precepts"
instead of "mindfulness trainings." But many Western
friends told me that the word "precepts" evokes in
them a strong feeling of good and evil, that if they
"break" a precept, they feel they have completely
failed. Precepts are different from "commandments."
They are the insights born from directly observing suf-
fering and the causes of suffering. They are the most
concrete expression of the practice of mindfulness.
That is why it is appropriate and helpful to describe
them as "mindfulness trainings."
Precepts usually begin with admonitions concerning
the bodv such as "not to kill." The Mindfulness
Trainings of the Order of Interbeing are the opposite-

ss INTERBEING
the ones concerning the mind come first. According to
the teachings of the Buddha, the mind is the root of
everything else. These then are the Mindfulness
Trainings of the Order of Interbeing:
First: Aware of the suffering created by fanaticism and intol-
erance, we are determined not to be idolatrous about or
bound to any doctrine, theory, or ideology, even Buddhist
ones. Buddhist teachings are guiding means to help us learn
to look deeply and to develop our understanding and com-
passion. They are not doctrines to fight, kill, or die for.
This mindfulness training is the roar of the lion. Its
spirit is characteristic of Buddhism. It is often said that
the Buddha's teaching is only a raft to help you cross
the river, a finger pointing to the moon. Don't mistake
the finger for the moon. The raft is not the shore. If we
cling to the raft, if we cling to the finger, we miss
everything. We cannot, in the name of the finger or the
raft, kill each other. Human life is more precious than
any ideology or doctrine.
The Order of Interbeing was born in Vietnam dur-
ing the war, which was a conflict between two world
ideologies. In the name of ideologies and doctrines,
people kill and are killed. If you have a gun, you can
shoot one, two, three, five people; but if you have an
ideology and stick to it, thinking it is the absolute
truth, you can kill millions. This mindfumess training
includes the admonition not to kill in its deepest sense.
Hmnankind suffers very much from attachment to
views. "If you don't follow this teaching, I will cut off
your head." In the name of the truth, we kill each

90 BEING PEACE
other. The world is stuck in that situation. There are
people who still think that Marxism is the highest
product of the human mind, that nothing can compare
with it. Others think it is crazy, and that we have to
destroy those people. We are caught in this situation.
One of the most basic teachings of the Buddha is
that life is precious. Peace can only be achieved when
we are free from fanaticism. The more you practice this
mindfulness training, the deeper you will go into real-
ity and understand the teaching of the Buddha.
Second: Aware of the suffering created by attachment to
views and wrong perceptions, we are determined to avoid
being narrow-minded and bound to present views. We shall
learn and practice nonattachment from views in order to be
open to others' insights and experiences. We are aware that
the knowledge we presently possess is not changeless,
absolute truth. Truth is found in lyfe, and we will observe
life within and around us in every moment, ready to learn
throughout our lives.
This mindfulness training arises from the first one.
Remember the young father who refused to open the
door to his own son, thinking the boy was already
dead. The Buddha said, "If you cling to something as
absolute truth and are caught in it, when truth comes
in person and knocks on your door, you will refuse to
let it in." A scientist with an open mind, who can ques-
tion the present knowledge of science, will have more
of a chance of discovering a higher truth. A Buddhist
in her quest for higher understanding, also has to
question her present views concerning reality. The

91 imiaizmaiwc
technique of understanding is to overcome views and
knowledge. The way of nonattachment from views is
the basic teaching of Buddhism concerning under-
standing.
Third: Aware of the sujfering brought about when we
impose our views on others, we are committed not to force
others, even our children, by any means whatsoever-such
as authority, threat, money, propaganda, or indoctrina-
tion-to adopt our views. We will respect the right of others
to be dyferent and to choose what to believe and how to
decide. We will, however, help others renounce fanaticism
and narrowness through compassionate dialogue.
This also springs from the First Mindfulness Training.
It is the spirit of free inquiry. I think Westerners can
accept this, because you understand it. If you can find
a way to organize it globally it will be a happy event
for the world.
Fourth: Aware that looking deeply at the nature of suffering
can help us develop compassion and find ways out of suffer-
ing, we are determined not to avoid or close our eyes before
suffering. We are committed to finding ways, including per-
sonal contact, images, and sounds, to be with those who suf-
fer, so we can understand their situation deeply and help
them transform their suffering into compassion, peace, and
ivy-
'Ihe first Dharma talk given by the Buddha was on the
Four Noble Truths. The first truth is the existence of
suffering. Contact with and awareness of suffering is

oz msmc; PEACE
needed. If we don't encounter pain, ills, we won't look
for the causes of pain and ills to find a remedy a way
out of the situation.
America is somehow a closed society. Americans
are not very aware of what is going on outside of
America. Life here is so busy that even if you watch
television and read the newspaper, and the images
from outside flash by there is no real contact. I hope
you will find some way to nourish the awareness of
the existence of suffering in the world. Of course,
inside America there is also suffering, and it is impor-
tant to stay in touch with that. But much of the suffer-
ing in the West is unnecessary and can vanish when
we see the real suffering of other people. Sometimes
we suffer because of some psychological fact. We can-
not get out of our self, and so we suffer. If we get in ·
touch with the suffering in the world and are moved
by that suffering, we may come forward to help the
people who are suffering, and our own suffering may
just vanish.
Futh: Aware that true happiness is rooted in peace, solidity,
freedom, and compassion, and not in wealth or fame, we are
determined not to take as the aim of our We fame, profit,
wealth, or sensual pleasure, nor to accumulate wealth while
millions are hungry and dying. We are committed to living
simply and sharing our time, energy, and material
resources with those in need. We will practice mindful con-
suming, not using alcohol, drugs, or any other products
that bring toxins into our own and the collective body and
consciousness.

93 immzmsinc
The Eight Realizations of Great Beings Sutra says, "The
human mind is always searching for possessions, and
never feels fulfilled. Bodhisattvas move in the opposite
direction and follow the principle of self-sufficiency.
They live a simple life in order to practice the Way,
and consider the realization of perfect understanding
as their only career." In the context of our modern
society simple living also means to remain as free as
possible from the destructive social and economic
machine, and to avoid stress, depression, high blood
pressure, and other modern diseases. We should make
every effort to avoid the pressures and anxieties that
fill most modern lives. The only way out is to consume
less. Once we are able to live simply and happily, we
are better able to help others.
Sixth: Aware that anger blocks communication and creates
sujfering, we are determined to take care of the energy of
anger when it arises and to recognize and transform the
seeds of anger that lie deep in our consciousness. When
anger comes up, we are determined not to do or say any-
thing, but to practice mindful breathing or mindful walking
and acknowledge, embrace, and look deeply into our anger.
We will learn to look with the eyes of compassion at those
we think are the cause of our anger.
We have to be aware of irritation or anger as it arises,
and try to understand it. Once we understand, we are
better able to forgive and love. Meditation on compas-
sion means meditation on understanding. If we do not
understand, we cannot love.

94 mam; mmcr
"Learn to look at other beings with the eyes of
compassion" is a quote from the Lotus Sutra chapter
on Avalokiteshvara. You might like to write this down
and put it in your sitting room. The original Chinese
is only five words: "compassionate eyes looking living
beings." The first time I recited the Lotus Sutra, when I
came to these five words, I was silenced. I knew that
these five words are enough to guide my whole life.
Seventh: Aware that ly'e is available only in the present
moment and that it is possible to live happily in the here
and now, we are committed to training ourselves to live
deeply each moment of daily lyfe. We will try not to lose
ourselves in dispersion or be carried away by regrets about
the past, worries about the future, or craving, anger, or jeal-
ousy in the present. We will practice mindful breathing to
come back to what is happening in the present moment. We
are determined to learn the art of mindful living by touch-
ing the wondrous, refreshing, and healing elements that are
inside and around us, and by nourishing seeds of joy, peace,
love, and understanding in ourselves, thus facilitating the
work of transformation and healing in our consciousness.
This mindfulness training is in the middle. It is the
heart of the Fourteen Mindfulness Trainings, the most
important one: to live in awareness. Without this
training, without mindfulness, the other mindfulness
trainings cannot be observed completely. It is like a
carrying pole. In Asia they used to carry things with a
pole, and put the middle of the pole on their shoul-
ders. This training is like the middle of the pole that
you carry on your shoulders.

ss INTERBEING
Eighth: Aware that lack of communication always brings
separation and sujfering, we are committed to training our-
selves in the practice of compassionate listening and loving
speech. We will learn to listen deeply without judging or
reacting and refrain from uttering words that can create dis-
cord or cause the community to break. We will make every
ejjfort to keep communications open and to reconcile and
resolve all conflicts, however small.
We now come to the second set of mindfulness train-
ings, concerning speech. The first seven trainings deal
with mind, then two with speech, and five with body.
This mindfulness training is about reconciliation, the
effort to make peace, not only in your family, but in
society as well. In order to help reconcile a conflict, we
have to be in touch with both sides. We must tran-
scend the conflict; if we are still in the conflict, it is dif-
ficult to reconcile. We have to have a non-dualistic
viewpoint in order to listen to both sides and under-
stand. The world needs people like this for the work of
reconciliation, people with the capacity of understand-
ing and compassion.-
Ninth: Aware that words can create sujfering or happiness,
we are committed to learning to speak truthfully and con-
structively, using only words that inspire hope and confi-
dence. We are determined not to say untruthful things for
the sake of personal interest or to impress people, nor to
utter words that might cause division or hatred. We will not
spread news that we do not know to be certain nor criticize
or condemn things of which we are not sure. We will do our
best to speak out about situations of injustice, even when
doing so may threaten our safety.

  ee memo enc};
The words we speak can create love, trust, and happi-
ness around us, or create a hell. We should be careful
about what we say. lf we tend to talk too much, we
should become aware of it and learn to speak less. We
must become aware of our speech and the results of
our speaking. There is a gatha that can be recited
before picking up the telephone:
Words can travel across thousands of miles.
May my words create mutual understanding
and love.
May they be as beautiful as gems,
as lovely as flowers.
We should speak constructively. In our speech we can
try not to cause misunderstanding, hatred, or jealousy
rather to increase understanding and mutual accep-
tance. This may even help reduce our telephone bills.
The Ninth Mindfuhwess Training also requires frank-
ness and courage. How many of us are brave enough
to denounce injustice in a situation in which speaking
the truth might threaten our own safety?
Tenth: Aware that the essence and aim of a Sangha is the
practice of understanding and compassion, we are deter-
mined not to use the Buddhist community for personal gain
or profit or transform our community into a political instru-
ment. A spiritual community should, however, take a clear
stand against oppression and injustice and should strive to
change the situation without engaging in partisan conflicts.
This does not mean that we must be silent about injus-

97 mrisizsrziwc;
tice. It just means we should do it with awareness and
not take sides. We should speak the truth and not just
weigh the political consequences. If we take sides, we
will lose our power to help mediate the conflict.
During one visit to America, I met with a group of
people who wanted to raise funds to help the govern-
ment of Vietnam rebuild the country. I asked whether
they would also like to do something for the boat peo-
ple, and they said no. They thought that politically it is
not good to talk about the boat people, because that
would discredit the government of Vietnam. In order
to succeed in one thing, they have to refrain from
doing something that they think is right.
Eleventh: Aware that great violence and injustice have been
done to our environment and society, we are committed not
to live with a vocation that is harmful to humans and
nature. We will do our best to select a livelihood that helps
realize our ideal of understanding and compassion. Aware of
global economic, political, and social realities, we will behave
responsibly as consumers and as citizens, not investing in
companies that deprive others of their chance to live.
This is an extremely hard training to observe. If you
are lucky enough to have a vocation that helps you
realize your ideal of compassion, you still have to
understand more deeply. If I am a teacher, I am very
glad to have this job helping children. I am glad that I
am not a butcher who kills cows and pigs. Yet the son
and the daughter of the butcher come to my class, and
I teach them. They profit from my right livelihood. My
son and daughter eat the meat that the butcher pre-

oa BEING PEACE
pares. We are linked together. I cannot say that my
livelihood is perfectly right. It carmot be. Observing this
mindfulness training includes finding ways to realize a
collective right livelihood.
You may try to follow a vegetarian diet, to lessen the
killing of animals, but you cannot completely avoid the
killing. When you drink a glass of water, you kill many
tiny living beings. Even in your dish of vegetables,
there are quite a lot of them, boiled or fried. I am aware
that my vegetarian dish is not completely vegetarian,
and I think that if my teacher, the Buddha, were here,
he could not avoid that either. The problem is whether
we are determined to go in the direction of compassion
or not. If we are, then can we reduce the suffering to a
minimum? If I lose my direction, I have to look for the
North Star, and I go to the north. That does not mean I
expect to arrive at the North Star. Ijust want to go in
that direction.
Twehths Aware that much suffering is caused by war and
conflict, we are determined to cultivate nonviolence, under-
standing, and compassion in our daily lives, to promote peace
education, mindful mediation, and reconciliation within fam-
ilies, communities, nations, and in the world. We are deter-
mined not to kill and not to let others kill. We will diligently
practice deep looking with our Sangha to discover better
ways to protect ly‘e and prevent war.
The defense budgets in Western countries are still enor-
mous. Studies show that by stopping the arms race, we
will have more than enough money to erase poverty,
hunger, illiteracy, and many diseases from the world.

99 INTERBEING
This mindfulness training applies not only to humans,
but to all living beings. As we have seen, no one can
observe this training to perfection; however, the
essence is to respect and protect life, to do our best to
protect life. This means not killing, and also not letting
other people kill. It is difficult. Those who try to
observe this training have to be working for peace in
order to have peace in themselves. Preventing war is
much better than protesting against the war. Protesting
the war is too late.
Thirteenth: Aware of the sufering caused by exploitation,
social injustice, stealing, and oppression, we are committed
to cultivating loving kindness and learning ways to work for
the well-being of people, animals, plants, and minerals. We
will practice generosity by sharing our time, energy, and
material resources with those who are in need. We are deter-
mined not to steal and not to possess anything that should
belong to others. We will respect the property of others, but
will try to prevent others from profiting from human suffer-
ing or the suffering of other beings.
Bringing to our awareness the pain caused by social
injustice, the Thirteenth Mindfulness Training urges us
to work for a more livable society. This training is
linked with the Fourth l\/lindfulness Training (the
awareness of suffering), the Fifth Mindfulness Training
(lifestyle), the Eleventh Mindfulness Training (right
livelihood), and the Twelfth Mindfulness Training (the
protection of life). ln order to deeply comprehend this
training, we must also meditate on these four mindful- ,
ness trainings.

mo msmc mics
To develop ways to prevent others from profiting
from human suffering and the suffering of other beings
is the duty of legislators and politicians. However, each
of us can also act in this direction. To some degree, we
can be close to oppressed people and help them protect
their right to life and defend themselves against
oppression and exploitation. Letting people profit from
human suffering or the suffering of other beings is
something we cannot do. As a community we must try
to prevent this. How to work for justice in our own city
is a problem we have to consider. The bodhisattvas'
v0ws-to help all sentient beings-are immense. Each
of us can vow to sit in their rescue boats.
Fourteenth: (For lay members): Aware that sexual relations
motivated by craving cannot dissipate the feeling of loneli-
ness but will create more sujfering, frustration, and isola-
tion, we are determined not to engage in sexual relations
without mutual understanding, love, and a long-term com-
mitment. In sexual relations, we must be aware of future
sujfering that may be caused. We know that to preserve the
happiness of ourselves and others, we must respect the rights
and commitments of ourselves and others. We will do every-
thing in our power to protect children from sexual abuse and
to protect couples and families from being broken by sexual
misconduct. We will treat our bodies with respect and pre-
serve our vital energies (sexual, breath, spirit) for the real-
ization of our bodhisattva ideal. We will be fully aware of the
responsibility of bringing new lives into the world, and will
meditate on the world into which we are bringing new
beings.

101 imisnsisrnc
(For monastic members): Aware that the aspiration of a
monk or a nun can only be realized when he or she wholly
leaves behind the bonds of worldly love, we are committed to
practicing chastity and to helping others protect themselves.
We are aware that loneliness and sujering cannot be allevi-
ated by the coming together of two bodies in a sexual rela-
tionship, but by the practice of true understanding and com-
passion. We know that a sexual relationship will destroy our
lde as a monk or a nun, will prevent us from realizing our
ideal of serving living beings, and will harm others. We are
determined not to suppress or mistreat our body or to look
upon our body as only an instrument, but to learn to handle
our body with respect. We are determined to preserve vital
energies (sexual, breath, spirit) for the realization of our bod-
hisattva ideal. ,
You may have the impression that this mindfulness
training discourages having children, but it is not so. It
only urges us to be aware of what we are doing. Is our
world safe enough to bring in more children? If you
want to bring more children into the world, then do
something for the world.
This training also has to do with celibacy.
Traditionally, Buddhist monks were celibate for at least
three reasons. The first is that the monks in the time of
the Buddha were urged to practice meditation for most
of the day. They had to be in contact with the people in
the village in order to teach them the Dharma, and in
order to ask for some food for the day. If a monk had to
support a family, he would not be able to perform his
duties as a monk.

102 BEING PEACE
The second reason is that sexual energy had to be
preserved for meditation. In the religious and medical
traditions of Asia, the human person was said to have
three sources of energy: sexual, breath, and spirit.
Sexual energy is what you spend during sexual inter-
course. Breath energy is the kind of energy you spend
when you talk too much and breathe too little. Spirit
energy is energy that you spend when you worry too
much and do not sleep well. If you spend these three
sources of energy your body will not be strong
enough to penetrate deeply into reality and realize the
Way Buddhist monks observed celibacy not because
of moral admonition, but to conserve energy. Someone
on a long fast knows how important it is to preserve
these three sources of energy.
The third reason Buddhist monks observed celibacy
is the question of suffering. Even today if we go to
India we see many children without food and many
children sick without medicine. One woman can give
birth to ten, twelve children, without being able to
feed two or three properly. The existence of suffering
is the first truth in Buddhism. To bring a child into the
world is a great responsibility. If you are wealthy,
maybe you can do it with no problem. But if you are
poor, this is a real concern. To be reborn means first to
be reborn in your children. Your children are a contin-
uation of yourself. You are reborn in them, and you
continue the cycle of suffering. Aware that having
more children in the society of his day would be to
make them suffer, the Buddha urged the monks not to
have children. I think that during the past 2,500 years,

ms iwrsiusrmc
Buddhist monks in many countries have helped curb
the birth rate. That is quite important.
The Fourteenth Mindfulness Training urges us to
respect our own body and to maintain our energy for
the realization of the Way. Not only meditation, but
any efforts that are required to change the world
require energy. We should take good care of ourselves.
In my opinion, the liberation of sexual behavior in
the West has caused a number of good results, but has
also caused some problems. The liberation of women,
because of modern birth control methods, has been
something very real. In the past, young girls in Asia as
well as Europe had enormous problems and some
even committed suicide when they became pregnant.
Since the discovery of birth control, these kinds of·
tragedies have lessened considerably. But the libera-
tion of sexual behavior has also caused much stress,
much trouble. I think the fact that many people suffer
from depression is partly because of that. Please medi-
tate on this problem. It is an important problem for
Western society.
If you wish to have children, please do something
for the world you will bring them into. That will make
you someone who works for peace, in one way or
another.

c H A P 1 E R s s v n N
Meditation in Daily Late
During retreats, from time to time a Bell Master
invites the bell to sound, silently reciting this
poem first:
Body, speech, and mind in perfect oneness,
I send my heart along with the sound of the bell.
May the hearer awaken from forgetfulness
And transcend all anxiety and sorrow.
Then he or she breathes three times, and invites the
bell to sound. When the rest of us hear the bell, we
stop our thinking and breathe in and out three times,
reciting this verse:
Listen, listen,
This wonderful sound
brings me back to my true self.

106 memo r>1sAc1;
Meditation is to be aware of what is going on: in
your body in your feelings, in your mind, and in the
world. The most precious practice in Buddhism is
meditation, and it is important to practice meditation
in a joyful mood. We have to smile a lot in order to be
able to meditate. The Bell of Mindfulness helps us to
do this.
>(- >(- ¤(·
Suppose we have a son who becomes an unbearable
young man. It may be hard for us to love him. That is
natural. In order to be loved, a person should be lov-
able. If our son has become difficult to love, we will
be very Lmhappy. We wish we could love him, but
the only way we can is to understand him, to under-
stand his situation. We have to take our son as the
subject of our meditation. Instead of taking the con-
cept of emptiness or some other subject, we can take
our son as a concrete subject for our meditation.
First we need to stop the invasion of feelings and
thoughts, which deplete our strength in meditation,
and cultivate the capacity the power of concentra-
tion. In Sanskrit this is called samadhi. For a child
to do his homework he has to stop chewing gum and
stop listening to the radio, so he can concentrate on
the homework. lf we want to understand our son, we
have to learn to stop the things that divert our at-
tention. Concentration, samadhi, is the first practice
of meditation.
When we have a light bulb, for the light to concentrate on our book, we need a lamp shade to keep
the light from dispersing, to concentrate the light so
that we can read the book more easily. The practice
of concentration is like acquiring a lamp shade to
help us concentrate our mind on something. While
doing sitting or walking meditation, cutting the
future, cutting the past, dwelling in the present time,
we develop our own power of concentration. With
that power of concentration, we can look deeply into
the problem. This is insight meditation. First we are
aware of the problem, focusing all our attention on
the problem, and then we look deeply into it in order
to understand its real nature, in this case the nature
of our son's unhappiness.
We don't blame our son. We just want to under-
stand why he has become like that. Through this
method of meditation, we find out all the causes,
near and far, that have led to our son's present state
of being. The more we see, the more we understand.
The more we understand, the easier it is for us to
have compassion and love. Understanding is the
source of love. Understanding is love itself. Under-
standing is another name for love; love is another
name for understanding. When we practice
Buddhism, it is helpful to practice in this way.
\Nhen you grow a tree, if it does not grow well,
you don't blame the tree. You look into the reasons it
is not doing well. You may need fertilizer, or more
water, or less sun. You never blame the tree, yet we
blame our son. If we know how to take care of him,
he will grow well, like a tree. Blaming has no effect

ws mzmc PEACE
at all. Never blame, never try to persuade using reason
and arguments. They never lead to any positive effect.
That is my experience. No argument, no reasoning, no
blame, just understanding. If you understand, and you
show that you understand, you can love, and the situa- .
tion will change.
>(· >(· >(·
The Bell of Mindfulness is the voice of the Buddha
calling us back to ourselves. We have to respect that A
sound, stop our thinking and talking, and go back to
ourselves, with a smile and breathing. It is not a
Buddha from the outside. It is our own Buddha who
calls us. If we cannot hear the sound of the bell, then
we cannot hear other sounds which also come from
the Buddha, like the sound of the wind, the sound of
the bird, even the sounds of cars or a baby crying. They
are all a call from the Buddha to return to ourselves.
Practicing with a bell from time to time is helpful, and
once you can practice with a bell, you can practice
with the wind and other sounds. After that you can
practice not only with the sounds, but with forms. The
sunlight coming through your window is also a calling
from Dharmakaya in order for the Buddhakaya to be,
and also for the Sanghakaya to be real.
"Calming, Smiling, Present moment, Wonderful
moment." While you sit you can recite that, and while
you do walking meditation you can use that, or you
can use other methods, like counting: Breathing in,
one. Breathing out, one. Breathing in, two. Out, two.

109 M1aD1rAT1oN1N mm rms
ln, three; out, three. Until ten, and then you decrease:
ten, and then nine, eight, seven. Counting the breath
is one of the ways to educate yourself for concentra-
tion, samadhi.
If you do not have enough concentration, you can-
not be strong enough to break through, to have a
breakthrough into a subject of your meditation.
Therefore breathing, walking, sitting, and other prac-
tices are primarily for you to realize some degree of
concentration. This is called Stop. Stop, in order to
concentrate. Just as the lamp shade stops the light
from dispersing so you can read your book more easily the first step of meditation is stopping, stopping
the dispersion, concentrating on one subject. The best
subject, the most available subject, is your breathing.
Breathing is wonderful. It Lmites body and mind.
Whether you count breaths or just follow them, it is
for stopping.

Stopping and seeing are very close. As soon as
you stop, the words on the page become clear, the
problem of our son becomes clear. Stop and look,
that's meditation, insight meditation. Insight means
you have a vision, an insight into reality. Stopping is
also to see, and seeing helps to stop. The two are
one. We do so much, we run so quickly, the situation
is difficult, and many people say "Don't just sit there,
do something." But doing more things may make
the situation worse. So you should say "Don't just
do something, sit there." Sit there, stop, be yourself
first, and begin from there. That is the meaning of
meditation. When you sit in the meditation hall or

no BEING PEACE
at home or wherever you are, you can do that. But
you have to really sit. Iust sitting is not enough. Sit
and be. Sitting without being is not sitting. Be stop-
ping and seeing.
There are so many methods of stopping and seeing,
and intelligent teachers will be able to invent ways to
help you. In Buddhism it is said that there are 84,000
Dharma doors for you to enter reality. Dharma doors
are means of practice, ways of practice. When we ride
on a horse that is out of control, I think our deepest
wish is to stop. How can we stop? We have to resist
the speed, the losing of ourselves, and therefore we
must organize a resistance. Spending two hours on
one cup of tea during a tea meditation is an act of
resistance, nonviolent resistance. We can do it because
we have a Sanghakaya. We can do it together, we can
resist a way of life that makes us lose ourselves. Walk-
ing meditation is also resistance. Sitting is also resis-
tance. So if you want to stop the course of armaments,
you have to resist, and begin by resisting in your own
daily life. I saw a car from New York with a bumper
sticker, "Let peace begin with me." That's correct. And
let me begin with peace. That is also correct.
>l- >(· =(·
Walking meditation can be very enjoyable. We walk
slowly alone or with friends, if possible in some beau-
tiful place. Walking meditation is really to enjoy the
walking. Walking not in order to arrive, just for walk-
ing. The purpose is to be in the present moment and

111 M1ao1rAr1oN IN mm me
enjoy each step you make. Therefore you have to
shake off all worries and anxieties, not thinking of
the future, not thinking of the past, just enjoying the
present moment. You can take the hand of a child as
you do it. You walk, you make steps as if you are the
happiest person on Earth.
We walk all the time, but usually it is more like
running. When we walk like that, we print anxiety
and sorrow on the Earth. We have to walk in a way
that we only print peace and serenity on Earth.
Every one of us can do that provided that we want it
very much. Any child can do that. lf we can take one
step like that, we can take two, three, four, and five.
l/Vhen we are able to take one step peacefully, hap-
pily, we are for the cause of peace and happiness for
the whole of humankind. Walking meditation is a
wonderful practice.
X- >(· >(·
The Buddha's basic Dharma talk concerning medita-
tion, the Sutiputthanu Sutta, is available in Pali,
Chinese, and many other languages, including
English and French. According to this text, to medi-
tate is to be aware of what is going on in your body,
in your feelings, in your mind, and in the objects of
your mind, which are the world. If you are aware of
what is going on, then you can see problems as they
unfold, and you can help prevent many of them.
When things explode, it is too late. How we deal
with our daily lives is the most important question.

112 memo mics
How we deal with our feelings, our speaking, with
ordinary things every day is just meditation. We
must learn to apply meditation in our daily lives.
There are many easy things to do. For instance,
before eating the evening meal, everyone can sit
around the table, and practice breathing, three slow
breaths. You breathe to recover yourself, to be your-
self. I am sure that every time you breathe deeply like
that, you become entirely yourself again. Then before
eating you can look at everyone and smile, just two
or three seconds, not much, for each person. We
never have time to look at each other, even those we
love, and soon it will be too late. It is wonderful to do
that, to openly appreciate everyone in our own
household.
In Plum Village, it is a child who reads the gatha
before eating. Holding up a bowl of rice, he knows he
is very lucky. Being a refugee he knows that in many
countries of Southeast Asia, children do not have
enough to eat. The kind of rice that they buy in the
West is the best kind of rice imported from Thailand.
The children know that even in Thailand, Thai chil-
dren do not have the opportunity to eat such rice.
They eat poorer quality rice. The good rice is
exported for the country to get foreign currency
When a refugee boy holds up a bowl of rice, he has to
remember that he is lucky. He knows that 40,000 chil-
dren his age die in the world each day because of
hunger. Then the child says something like this:
"Todav on the table there are good things that Mama
just cooked. There I see Papa, there I see my brother,
there I see my sister; it is so good to be together and
eat together like this, while there are many who are
hungry. I feel very thankful."
There are so many practices we can do to bring
awareness into om everyday lives: breathing between
telephone calls, walking meditation between business
meetings, practicing meditation while helping hun-
gry children or war victims. Buddhism must be
engaged. What is the use of practicing meditation if it
does not have anything to do with our daily lives?
>(· >|· ¢(-
You can feel very happy while practicing breathing
and smiling. The conditions are available. You can do
it in a meditation hall. You can do it at home. You can
do it in a park, along the riverside, anywhere. I
would like to suggest that in each home we have a
tiny room for breathing. We have a room for sleeping,
a room for eating, and a room for cooking, why not
have one room for breathing? Breathing is very
important.
I suggest that that room be decorated very simply,
and not be too bright. You may want to have a small
bell, one with a beautiful sound, a few cushions or
chairs, and perhaps a pot of flowers to remind us of
our true nature. Children can arrange flowers in
mindfulness, smiling. If your household has five
members, you can have five cushions or chairs, plus
a few for guests. From time to time, you might like to
invite a guest to come and sit and breathe with you
for five minutes, or three minutes.

l 114 BEING PEACE
If you want to have a statue or a painting of a
Buddha, please be choosy. Many times I see Buddhas
who are not relaxed and peaceful. The artists who
make them do not practice breathing, smiling. Be
choosy if you ask a Buddha to come home. A Buddha
should be smiling, happy, beautiful, for the sake of
our children. If they look at the Buddha and don't
feel refreshed and happy then it is not a good statue.
lf you don't find a beautiful Buddha, wait, and have
a flower instead. A flower is a Buddha. A flower has
Buddha nature.

I know of families where children go into a room
like that after breakfast, sit down and breathe for ten
times, in-out-one, in-out-two, in-out-three, ten times,
and then they go to school. This is a very beautiful
practice. lf your child doesn't wish to breathe ten
times, how about three times? Beginning the day
with being a Buddha is a very nice way to start the
day. If we are a Buddha ml the morning and we try to
nourish the Buddha throughout the day we may be
able to come home at the end of a day with a smile-
the Buddha is still there.

When you become agitated, you do not have to do
or say anything. Just follow your breathing and walk
slowly into that room. (The room for breathing also
symbolizes our own inner Buddha Land, so we can
enter it whenever we need to, even if we are not at
home). I have a friend who, whenever he becomes
agitated, enters the breathing room in his home. He
sits down respectfully breathes in and out three
times, invites the bell to sound, and recites the gatha.

ns Msommou IN mm use
Immediately he feels better. If he needs to sit longer,
he stays there. From time to time, his wife hears the
sound of the bell, and it reminds her to be mindful in
her work. At such times, she deeply appreciates her
husband. "He is so wonderful, quite different from
others. He knows how to deal with anger." If she has
been irritated, her own resentment subsides. Some-
times she stops what she is doing and goes into the
breathing room to sit with him. This picture is so
lovely, more beautiful than an expensive painting.
Doing things in this way has a good effect on every-
one, teaching by example, not just with words. When
your child is agitated, you don't have to say, "Go to
that room!" You can take his or her hand and walk
together into the room for breathing, and sit quietly
together. This is the best education for peace.
It is really beautiful to begin the day by being a
Buddha. Each time we feel ourselves about to leave
our Buddha, we can sit and breathe until we return
to our true self. There are three things I can recom-
mend to you: arranging to have a breathing room in
your home, a room for meditation; practicing breath-
ing, sitting, for a few minutes every moming at home
with your children; and going out for a slow walking
meditation with your children before going to sleep,
just ten minutes is enough. These things are very
important. They can change our civilization.
r
%!\¢_/

About the author
Thich Nhat Hanh was born in central Vietnam in 1926,
and he left home as a teenager to become a Zen monk.
He founded the School of Youth for Social Service, Van
Hanh Buddhist University and the Order of
Interbeing. In 1966, he was invited by the Fellowship
of Reconciliation to tour the United States to describe
to us the enormous suffering of his people. Because of
his fierce neutrality he was unable to return home,
and he was granted asylmn in France, where he is
head of a small community of meditators and activists.
Thich Nhat Hanh is author of many books, including
Living Buddha, Living Christ, Peace Is Every Step, and
Old Path White Clouds.
About the illustrator
Born in a suburb of Tokyo in 1941, Mayumi Oda
shares Thich Nhat Hanh's understanding of the suffer-
ings of war, coupled with a passionate commitment to
the expression of joy. An internationally recognized
artist, her bold contemporary imagery has been identi-
fied with the work of Matisse. She has had many one-
woman exhibits in Iapan and the U.S., and her work is
in the permanent collections of the Museum of
Modern Art in New York, the Musemn of Fine Arts in
Boston, and the Library of Congress. Mayumi Oda
now lives and works near the Green Gulch Zen
Center, just north of San Francisco.
About the editor
Arnold Kotler was an ordained student at the San
Francisco and Tassajara Zen Centers from 1969 to 1984.
He is the founding editor of Parallax Press and a mem-
ber of Thich Nhat Hanh's Order of Interbeing.

mann
Parallax Press publishes books and tapes on mindful
awareness and social responsibility. We carry all
books and tapes by Thich Nhat Hanh. For a copy of
our free catalog, please write to:
Parallax Press
PO. Box 7355
Berkeley California 94707
www.parallax.org

Thich Nhat Hanh has retreat communities in southwestern France (Plum Village) and in Vermont (Green Mountain Dharma Center), where monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen practice the art of mindful living. Visitors are invited to join the practice for at least one week. For information, please write to:

Plum Village Green Mountain Dharma Center
13 Martineau PO. Box 182
33580 Dieulivol Hartland Four Corners, VT 05049

France: www.plumvillage.org

